











































 

 
 

 

  



 

 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

FOREWORD 
 

Advertising is the currency of the Internet.  The Internet has been 

plagued with fake news and ad-fraud.  Blockchain was supposed 

to solve the problems of security, efficiency, and true 

decentralization with real-world applications. It too has faltered.  

Mining currency is slow, expensive, and a waste of energy to 

generate consensus. The Whisper Network Protocol 

revolutionizes blockchain forever with the development of the 

fastest blockless directed acyclic graph ledger.  

Lydian will be building the Whisper Network and then build its own 

two decentralized applications (Mona Chain & Mona Browse), that 

affect a $230 billion advertising industry. Lydian will then license 

the Whisper Network to other industries similar to as other tech 

giants like IBM, Microsoft, and Intel.  
 

This has the potential to change blockchain forever. 

  

 



 

 
 

 

Final Product Whitepaper 

LYDIANCOIN PTE. LTD. 
 
200,000,000 Lydian (LDN) Tokens 

THE PERIOD FOR THE SALE OF LYDIAN (LDN) TOKENS WILL EXPIRE ON:  

THE DATE ON WHICH THE MAXIMUM PURCHASE AMOUNT HAS BEEN 

SUBSCRIBED FOR AND ACCEPTED BY THE COMPANY AND A FINAL 

CLOSING IS CONDUCTED OF CLOSING OF THE ICO. 

This Confidential Product Whitepaper (this “Whitepaper”) has been prepared by 

LydianCoin Pte. Ltd., a Singapore private limited company (“LydianCoin SG”), for 

use by purchasers to whom LydianCoin SG is offering the opportunity to purchase 

up to 200,000,000 Lydian tokens, with potential opportunities to purchase an 

additional 200,000,000 Lydian tokens in subsequent offerings.  There is a minimum 

purchase amount of seventy (70) Lydian tokens per purchase.   

This Whitepaper supersedes in their entirety any and all previous draft whitepapers, 

term sheets, verbal or written communications or other information regarding the 

offering described herein.  Prospective purchasers should rely only upon the 

information contained in the most recent dated Whitepaper in evaluating the sale of 

Lydian tokens and any purchase decisions should be based solely upon such 

information.   

DISCLAIMER – IMPORTANT NOTICE:  Please read the notices in Schedule A 

carefully before reading this Whitepaper, which apply to all persons who read this 

document and may be updated.   

 

 

 



 

 
 

 

THE OFFER AND SALE OF TOKENS IS SUBJECT TO REVIEW AND 

REGULATION BY GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITIES IN VARIOUS 

JURISDICTIONS, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION THE UNITED STATES, 

HONG KONG, CHINA, SINGAPORE AND CANADA.  PURCHASERS OF 

TOKENS MUST BE AWARE THAT LYDIANCOIN SG HAS NOT FILED OR 

SUBMITTED THIS WHITEPAPER TO, AND THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF 

THE SALE OF THE TOKENS HAVE NOT BEEN APPROVED BY, ANY SUCH 

GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITIES.  BECAUSE OF INCREASING SCRUTINY BY 

SUCH GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITIES AND THE POTENTIAL FOR 

ENFORCEMENT PROCEEDINGS AGAINST SELLERS OF TOKENS OR COINS 

IN “INITIAL COIN OFFERINGS,” TOKENS PURCHASERS NEED TO 

UNDERSTAND THAT THEY MAY LOSE THEIR TOKENS AS A RESULT OF 

SUCH ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS.  SEE “RISK FACTORS” IN SECTION 6 

HEREIN, FOR FURTHER INFORMATION ABOUT RISKS RELATED TO 

PURCHASING LYDIAN TOKENS. 

THE TOKENS DESCRIBED IN THIS WHITEPAPER INVOLVE RISKS AND ARE 

OFFERED ONLY TO PURCHASERS WHO FIT THE DEFINITION OF AN 

ACCREDITED INVESTOR UNDER SECTION 501 OF REGULATION D UNDER 

THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, WHO AGREE TO ASSUME 

SUCH RISK FOR AN INDEFINITE PERIOD OF TIME AND WHO AGREE TO 

PURCHASE THE TOKENS ONLY WITH A VIEW TOWARDS EXCHANGING THE 

TOKENS FOR DIGITAL MARKETING AND ADVERTISING SERVICES AS SET 

FORTH HEREIN AND NOT FOR THE TRANSFER, RESALE, EXCHANGE OR 

FURTHER DISTRIBUTION THEREOF. 

 

 

 

 

 



 

 
 

IMPORTANT NOTICE:   

ANY NON-ENGLISH LANGUAGE VERSION OF THIS DOCUMENT IS 

TRANSLATION OF AN ENGLISH LANGUAGE DOCUMENT.  IT IS PROVIDED 

FOR INFORMATION ONLY, DOES NOT CONSTITUTE AN OFFER TO BUY OR 

SELL OR A SOLICITATION OF AN OFFER TO BUY OR SELL LYDIAN TOKENS 

AND HAS NO LEGAL EFFECT AND SHOULD NOT BE RELIED UPON.   

PROSPECTIVE PURCHASERS OF LYDIAN TOKENS SHOULD RELY ONLY ON 

THE ORIGINAL ENGLISH LANGUAGE DOCUMENT OF WHICH THIS IS A 

TRANSLATION IN RELATION TO ANY DECISION RELATING TO THE SUBJECT 

MATTER OF THIS DOCUMENT.  IN THE EVENT OF A DISCREPANCY, 

CONFLICT OR OTHER AMBIGUITY WITH RESPECT TO THE WHITEPAPER 

AND ANY TRANSLATION THEREOF, THE ENGLISH LANGUAGE VERSION OF 

THE WHITEPAPER SHALL GOVERN. 



 

 

 

 

Abstract 

Digital advertising allows companies to communicate, educate, and engage with 

their customers through multiple technology channels.  Businesses utilize ad-tech 

platforms to target customers across varying social, web, mobile, video, and native 

media.  Worldwide digital marketing expenditures are expected to exceed $232 

billion in 2017, eclipsing global spend on television advertising.1  

The digital advertising ecosystem, however, is far from perfect.  Plagued by 

inefficiencies like ad fraud, rent-charging intermediaries that add dubious value, 

defensive user/customer behaviors prompted by abusive legacy marketing 

practices, malware, and insufficient campaign efficacy reporting, the digital 

advertising experience is increasingly frustrating for both advertisers and 

consumers.  Purchasing advertising across different internet platforms, borders and 

currencies is also highly inefficient, wasteful and time consuming.    

 

 

 

 

 

 

New crypto-and blockchain related-ventures have raised more than $4 billion 

through token sales and coin offerings.  Our independent research reveals that, on 

average, between $100,000 to $500,000 is spent on digital marketing to promote 

these sales.  Crypto-ventures face additional marketing costs and challenges in 

identifying and educating potential customers for their products and services.  

These challenges can be met head on using the power of targeted, A.I.-driven 

digital marketing to identify, engage and educate potential customers.  

                                                 

1 See https://www.coinschedule.com/stats.php.  

https://www.coinschedule.com/stats.php


 

 

 

 

DaVinci 11through its subsidiary LydianCoin SG and its cryptocurrency, LydianCoin 

(LDN), will provide crypto and blockchain ventures with digital marketing services 

that DaVinci 11 and LydianCoin SG believe are state of the art and are already 

used by several Fortune 1000 companies and luxury brands worldwide.  Using 

LydianCoin, these ventures can reach beyond the known universe of existing 

crypto-investors and identify and engage new, specifically targeted investors and 

customers who wish to take advantage of the crypto blockchain ecosystem and 

transact in this market using an efficient, reliable and secure system.   

The hype and fear around cryptocurrencies has been exaggerated, presenting a 

unique opportunity for crypto and blockchain companies that are poised to take 

advantage of the multi-billion dollar internet advertising market.  Facebook recently 

announced that it is banning all ads that promote cryptocurrencies.2  Google may 

follow suit on the heels of statements by securities regulators in Canada that 

Google should take a similar course to Facebook and restrict ad content for binary 

options, ICO’s and cryptocurrencies.  

It is estimated that Facebook raked in close to $40 billion in ad revenue in 2017.3  

Google’s ad revenue in 2017 was estimated over $95 billion.4  

Cryptocurrencies as an asset class rose from $14 billion in December 2016 to over 

$450 billion in December 2017.5  So who is going to take advantage of the billions 

of crypto and blockchain related ad revenue that are left on the table if Facebook 

and Google do not?   

LydianCoin is a utility token engineered to meet the digital marketing needs of the 

crypto and blockchain space.   

Lydian tokens may be negotiated back to Lydian for digital marketing and 

advertising services that advance campaign effectiveness through (i) aggregating 

years of marketing placement, customer interaction and audience data, 

(ii) disintermediation, eliminating costs, (iii) utilizing DaVinci 11’s Whisper Network 

                                                 

2 https://www.recode.net/2018/1/30/16950926/facebook-mark-zuckerberg-bans-crypto-
advertising-bitcoin-james-altucher 

3 https://www.statista.com/statistics/271258/facebooks-advertising-revenue-worldwide/ 

4 https://www.statista.com/statistics/266249/advertising-revenue-of-google/ 

5 https://www.coindesk.com/2018-will-another-growth-year-blockchain/ 



 

 

 

 

Protocol and Artificial Intelligence platform, MonaLisa, to improve advertisement 

placement efficacy and (iv) leveraging industry relationships.   

In addition to the industry leading marketing services available today, Lydian token 

holders will have early access to two additional projects under development by 

DaVinci 11:  MonaChain and MonaBrowse.  MonaChain, a blockchain based 

system will utilize the Whisper Network Protocol and is designed to work in concert 

with MonaLisa. MonaChain will provide optimized ad placement services that 

combat common forms of ad fraud.  Following an initial exclusive period during 

which it is available only to Lydian token holders, MonaChain will be available to 

non-token holders for an additional cost.  MonaBrowse, to which Lydian token 

holders will also have exclusive advance access, will give purchasers an ad-free 

browsing experience across multiple platforms and devices without needing to 

download new browsers or browse differently.     

  



 

 

 

 

Table of Contents 

Abstract ………………………………………………………………………………..i 

1. Summary ............................................................................................. 1 

2. The State of Digital Advertising ........................................................... 2 

2.1 Digital Advertising Is Essential but Imperfect………… ...... …..2 

2.2 A Successful Token Offering is the First Step to the End 

Goal ........................................................................................ .3 

2.3 Crypto-Marketing Today .......................................................... 3 

3. The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family ....................................................... 6 

3.1 The DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud .......................................... 6 

3.2 DaVinci 11 Digital Marketing Strategy ..................................... 8 

3.3 Optimized Advertising for the Crypto-Community ................. 10 

3.4 MonaLisa:  DaVinci 11’s A.I. Platform ................................... 11 

3.5 MonaChain:  Reduce Ad Fraud and Build Data Value Using 

the Blockchain ....................................................................... 12 

3.6 MonaBrowse:  Blockchain-Powered, User-Centered Ad 

Experiences ........................................................................... 13 

3.7 Whisper Network Protocol ..................................................... 13 

4. What Is Lydian? ................................................................................. 15 

4.1 The Lydian Token .................................................................. 15 

4.2 Token Distribution .................................................................. 16 

4.3 Bounty Campaign .................................................................. 17 

4.4 Referral Program ................................................................... 18 

4.5 Lydian Token Sale - Key Data ............................................... 19 

4.6 Use of Token Sale Proceeds ................................................. 21 

4.7 Lydian-Fueled Marketing ....................................................... 21 

4.8 Why Purchase Services with Lydian Tokens Instead of Fiat 

Currency? .............................................................................. 24 

5. Management ...................................................................................... 27 

6. RISK FACTORS ................................................................................ 29 

SCHEDULE A ................................................................................................. 49 



  

 
1 

Summary 

The Lydian token (LDN) will be issued by LydianCoin SG, an indirect Singaporean 

subsidiary of Gravity4 Inc., a Delaware corporation, now doing business as DaVinci 

11.  DaVinci 11 is the direct or indirect parent of approximately 43 subsidiaries in 

the United Kingdom, Ireland, Bermuda, Sweden, Hong Kong, Taiwan, Australian, 

Mexico, the British Virgin Islands, Brazil, Singapore, Jersey, China, Malaysia, 

Denmark, Norway, Finland, Spain, Germany, the Netherlands, and Colombia 

(DaVinci 11, together with its subsidiaries, are referred to herein as the “DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family”).  The Lydian token will enable cryptocurrency purchases of 

targeted, A.I.-driven digital marketing and advertising services already offered by 

the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family and used by a number of Fortune 1000 

companies and luxury brands worldwide.  Lydian tokens will allow crypto-centric 

businesses to expand their marketing reach, engage and educate a targeted 

audience, and grow their customer base.   

Lydian token users will have exclusive access to data sets optimized to reach 

crypto-community audiences, data sets not available to DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family Customers paying in fiat currencies.  Lydian token holders will also have 

exclusive access to products and proprietary protocols currently under 

development, including MonaChain, a blockchain driven anti-ad fraud system, 

MonaBrowse, ad-free internet surfing without the hassle of changing browsers or 

surfing behavior, and the Whisper Network Protocol (WNP), which supports the 

MonaChain and MonaBrowse products.  

 

 

 

 

 
 

 

 



  

 
2 

 
2. The State of Digital Advertising  

Digital Advertising Is Essential but Imperfect 

Digital advertising is a massive, fast-paced industry.  Industry estimates suggest 

that 2017 global spend on digital advertising will be approximately $232 billion.6  Ad 

fraud takes a significant toll on this massive investment, an expected $16.4 billion 

worldwide in 2017.7  An estimated 20% of total programmatic digital ad spending 

was wasted due to fraud in 2016.8  In 2016, internet bots alone cost advertisers 

$7.2 billion.9   

Recent Google-run tests found fraudulent sales of ad space on premium websites 

sellers had no access to or fake versions of promised websites.10  Companies 

advertising their goods and services are understandably concerned that paid 

advertising is seen by consumers.11  However, many efforts to combat ad fraud 

have led to other difficulties, including more middlemen, lower publisher impression 

rates, and consumer ad blocker adoption. 

Other challenges in the digital advertising industry provide opportunities for 

innovation:  

Data Fragmentation:  Individual customers engage with many devices and 

services, fragmenting the data they provide.  Fragmentation challenges digital 

marketing platforms by increasing the cost of aggregation and quality assurance.  

Fragmentation also hinders campaign efficacy measurement, as well as attempts to 

create a single holistic view of customer engagement. 

                                                 

6 See eMarketer Report, Worldwide Ad Spending:  The eMarketer Forecast for 2017, 
eMarketer.com (Apr. 12, 2017), available at https://www.emarketer.com/Report/Worldwide-
Ad-Spending-eMarketer-Forecast-2017/2002019.   

7 See Lucy Handley, “Businesses could lose $16.4 billion to online advertising fraud in 2017:  
Report,” CNBC.com (Mar. 15, 2017), available at 

https://www.cnbc.com/2017/03/15/businesses-could-lose-164-billion-to-online-advert-fraud-
in-2017.html. 

8 See id. 

9 See Christopher Heine, “Bots Will Cost Digital Advertisers $7.2 Billion in 2016, Says ANA 
Study,” Adweek.com (Jan. 19, 2016), available at http://www.adweek.com/digital/bots-will-
cost-digital-advertisers-72-billion-2016-says-ana-study-169072/. 

10 See Michelle Castillo, “Online ad fraud is a ‘widespread’ problem, Google and other big ad 
platforms admit,” CNBC.com (July 22, 2017), available at 

https://www.cnbc.com/2017/07/21/google-oath-others-ad-fraud-widespread-problem.html. 

11 See id. 

https://www.emarketer.com/Report/Worldwide-Ad-Spending-eMarketer-Forecast-2017/2002019
https://www.emarketer.com/Report/Worldwide-Ad-Spending-eMarketer-Forecast-2017/2002019
https://www.cnbc.com/2017/03/15/businesses-could-lose-164-billion-to-online-advert-fraud-in-2017.html
https://www.cnbc.com/2017/03/15/businesses-could-lose-164-billion-to-online-advert-fraud-in-2017.html
http://www.adweek.com/digital/bots-will-cost-digital-advertisers-72-billion-2016-says-ana-study-169072/
http://www.adweek.com/digital/bots-will-cost-digital-advertisers-72-billion-2016-says-ana-study-169072/
https://www.cnbc.com/2017/07/21/google-oath-others-ad-fraud-widespread-problem.html


  

 
3 

Lack of Personalization:  Customers are bombarded by impersonal, irrelevant 

messaging.  Marketers need to adjust messaging and presentation for non-

disruptive, productive communication.  Digital marketing platforms utilizing more 

than demographic data can build effective communication strategies and deliver 

value. 

A Successful Token Offering is the First Step to the End Goal 

Public awareness of crypto- and blockchain technology has risen in 2017, fueled in 

part by increases in the market value of Bitcoin and Ethereum, more frequent token 

sales, ransomware demanding cryptocurrency payments, and the recent Bitcoin 

fork.  For ventures raising funds through token sales, funding is not the end, but 

merely the beginning of the story:  funding should be considered a promise to 

deliver a real product and/or service. 

To avoid falling into a dot com bubble pattern of capitalization and bust, newly-

capitalized crypto-companies must court customers for successfully-deployed, 

better, faster and/or cheaper products and services.  Building awareness, delivering 

the right messages, and driving customer engagement for products and services 

are necessary for continued growth in the crypto-space. 

Because companies often face a long road to commercially viable products and 

services, as well as profitability, it is critical to seek broad adoption of products and 

communicate a company’s vision to reach audiences beyond early stage investors 

and token purchasers.  Often, crypto-ventures deploy traditional advertising 

campaigns to promote token sales, eschewing coordinated consumer outreach and 

education campaigns.  This pattern is likely to limit brand and product awareness 

and ultimately impact long-term success.   

Crypto-Marketing Today 

Crypto-industry marketing and advertising ventures generally fall into two 

segments:  (i) large established companies that market new ventures using existing 

marketing campaigns (e.g., IBM, Microsoft, and Deloitte); and (ii) start-ups that 

market to the existing crypto-community.12 

                                                 

12 See Oscar Williams-Grut, “People are raising hundreds of millions selling digital coins 
online – it’s either the future of funding or a ‘bubble,’” BusinessInsider.com (Jul. 8, 2017), 
available at http://www.businessinsider.com/initial-coin-offerings-explained-icos-token-

crowdsale-2017-7 (describing typical ICO marketing to include Reddit and Slack channel use 
to directly reach potential investors and customers). 



  

 
4 

DaVinci 11 evaluated several large token sale and crypto-related corporate 

marketing strategies, and found that many companies raising funds lack knowledge 

and/or experience to effectively advertise to broad consumer audiences.  Among 

the strategies observed: 

Physical Advertising:  Often signs or billboards, necessarily limited in scope to 

persons physically present during a fixed time.  Physical advertising is typically 

static and aims to create brand recognition by attracting attention or through 

familiarity and repetition.  Physical advertisement can be limited in reach and depth.  

The limited amount of information conveyed by a static sign restricts the potential 

for consumer engagement and education.  Metrics for gauging effectiveness of 

physical advertising are limited, as are real-time uses for customer response data.   

Online Ad Networks:  A prior-generation marketing tool often used to promote token 

sales, limited in reach and susceptible to ad fraud.  Using a limited ad network of 

cryptocurrency-focused web sites, online ad networks are effective to reach 

consumers already aware of those sites but generally not expand the universe of 

potential customers.  Ad networks enable companies to deal with advertisers and 

companies to buy and sell ads across the internet.13   

“Dot com Bubble” Techniques:  Engineered for a single shock impression on 

customers.  A large splashy placement, like an expensive short-term advertisement 

at a heavily trafficked location or during a sporting event, to attract attention and 

create a “buzz” that continues beyond the scope and duration of the actual 

advertisement.  Even an effective “buzz” generating placement can be of negligible 

effect if it creates familiarity but fails to educate or explain the product or service, 

and fails to encourage deeper engagement with the brand at the time and place of 

impression.  Measurement of effectiveness is difficult with these techniques.   

Self-Promotion:  Self-promotion on Reddit page, Slack channel, or bitcointalk.org 

forum curation is frequently used by pre-product companies to publicize and 

explain their project, engage with potential customers, release new information, and 

generate interest.  Although these platforms provide immersive experiences, direct 

to consumer communication, and create useful engagement data, few potential 

customers outside of the crypto-community know to look for these means of 

communication, and post-token sale engagement levels through these channels 

                                                 

13 See “An Ad Tech Glossary:  Must-Know Terms, If You’re Looking for An Ad-Tech Partner,” 
AdAge.com (Mar. 3, 2015), available at http://adage.com/lookbook/article/toolsstrategy/ad-
tech-glossary-terms/298346/.   

http://adage.com/lookbook/article/toolsstrategy/ad-tech-glossary-terms/298346/
http://adage.com/lookbook/article/toolsstrategy/ad-tech-glossary-terms/298346/


  

 
5 

can be erratic.  Although an effective way to distribute information and directly 

interact with interested potential customers, these chat and thread driven platforms 

are of limited scope and reach. 

Industry Event Appearances:  Appearances enable deep engagement with 

consumers.  Crypto-related events and conferences attendees typically have a 

demonstrated interest in crypto-ventures.  Although in-person engagement 

provides a peerless opportunity to educate and communicate with consumers, 

unless those events are broadcast online or otherwise publicized, in-person 

appearances are of limited scope and duration, and it is hard to quantify the overall 

impact of a given speaking opportunity. 

Many companies understand that these old techniques do not generate an 

acceptable return on the customer’s advertising spend.  In summary, these 

outdated and limited marketing strategies may be somewhat effective within the 

crypto-community for now, but do not effectively scale to reach broader audiences, 

and generally lead to unpredictable and un-verifiable results.   

Lydian token holders can harness the computing power of DaVinci 11’s A.I. 

powered digital marketing cloud (the “DaVinci Marketing Cloud”) and its data-driven 

marketing tools to build effective crypto-market solutions that target new customers 

for next-generation products and services, packaged with verifiable metrics that 

support campaign efficacy. 

  



  

 
6 

2.1  The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family  

The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family employs approximately 400 employees at its 

offices located in 19 countries around the globe.  DaVinci 11 focuses on removing 

rent-seeking intermediaries and creating technological efficiencies that enable 

customers to avoid pervasive ad fraud and mitigate adblocking.  Since its inception 

in July 2014, DaVinci 11 has made multiple acquisitions to fuel its global growth 

and seeks to leverage its global footprint and A.I.-driven solutions to disrupt the 

digital marketing ecosystem.14 

The DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud 

DaVinci 11 offers the DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud, market-tested technology that 

leverages years of aggregated customer and placement data to optimize 

placements. Using predictive analytics and programmatic ad buying, DaVinci 11 

leverages big data in real-time.  The DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud identifies omni-

channel advertising opportunities by determining cost-effective and transparent 

marketing initiatives, without middlemen.  MonaLisa, DaVinci 11’s proprietary A.I. 

technology, aggregates data from multiple channels and uses the DAVINCI 11 

Marketing Cloud to build target consumer audiences.  The platform’s fluid, constant 

data stream is sorted into a semantic graph, using correlation variables to form 

connection clusters. 

Using the DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud’s customer experience collation capability, 

marketers can reach customers throughout the purchase journey and across 

touchpoints.  Lydian token holders can access over one billion web and mobile 

users and cherry-pick the most relevant impressions to engage a targeted 

consumer base.  

 

                                                 

14 See Jennifer Chan, “Gravity4 continues acquisition spree with purchase of ad2one,” 
Marketing-Interactive.com (May 1, 2016), available at http://www.marketing-
interactive.com/gravity4-continues-acquisition-spree-with-purchase-of-ad2one/.  



  

 
7 

 

          DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud 

 

DaVinci 11’s unique approach utilizes the major components of the DAVINCI 11 

Marketing Cloud stack: 

Free, fully-integrated enterprise software:  A client (a publisher, advertiser or ad 

agency) relies on enterprise software to reach its customers across social, mobile, 

CRM, email, web and Internet communication channels.  Many competitors’ current 

marketing cloud space requires consumers to pay for software and separates the 

data aggregated by customers of those platforms so that the data generated by the 

customer’s engagement is bifurcated from real-time marketing usage. DaVinci 11 



  

 
8 

provides these enterprise software apps for free through its front-facing App 

Center, which tracks and aggregates customer data. 

Optimized ad placement for value generation and ad targeting:  As the digital 

marketing industry has become programmatic, it faces a systemic threat in the form 

of ad fraud.  DaVinci 11’s private marketplace of unique premium inventory ensure 

that targeted ad slots result in advertising shown to real users.  This platform 

leverages exclusive inventory partnerships for advertising placement through long-

term contracts formed with premium publisher brands to combat ad fraud. 

DaVinci 11 Digital Marketing Strategy 

The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family designs the initial creative assets in consultation 

with the client, using an in-house design team and/or DaVinci 11’s dynamic creative 

optimization (“DCO”) technology.  DCO, a system that automates the 

personalization and creative targeting of ad creative, allowing marketers to 

differentiate and tailor push ad creative to a specific consumer using precise data.  

DCO refers to the set of advertising technologies that add speed, scale, and 

automation to the creative process.  Instead of showing one generalized set of 

creatives to everyone across the platforms, DCO technology segments audiences 

into custom groups based on targeting schemes and shows each group custom 

creatives that are more likely to create a meaningful engagement with the potential 

customer.  

Each managed account enables the platform’s media strategists to assist with the 

development of the media strategy and execution plan for the client.  These media 

strategists will work with DaVinci 11’s in-house creative design team to design the 

ad creative, upload assets into the marketing platform, set up targeting measures, 

build unique audiences, enable optimizations throughout the campaign, and 

provide campaign reports.  These media strategists will also utilize the A.I. 

components of the marketing cloud to create dynamic customized audience 

segments. 

The ads are trafficked into the DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud, powered by 

MonaLisa, and served to the relevant audiences across multiple channels (for 

instance, desktop, mobile, video, social, and native).  Great marketing requires 

great exposure, and an unseen advertisement is an investment with no chance for 



  

 
9 

return.  DaVinci 11’s platform automates the online advertising purchase process 

for advertisers, finds the best ad placement for the target audience and helps bring 

order to the fragmented media buying processes. 

The DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud is connected to open ad exchanges and its own 

premium private marketplaces, which provide a programmatic marketplace for 

publishers and advertisers to buy advertising placements at auction in real-time, 

and allows the platform to find the right users, bid on impressions and serve the 

related advertisement - all within the 30 milliseconds or less before a page loads.   

To craft a successful advertising campaign, it is vital to understand the client’s 

product and target audience.  The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family helps build a seed 

pool of audience data, which is stored in a data management platform (“DMP”).  

The DMP is used to store and analyze data. DaVinci 11’s proprietary DMP is used 

by advertisers to house and manage any form of information, to manage cookie 

IDs, and to generate audience segments, which are later used to target specific 

users with online ads.  This consolidated data warehouse aggregates campaign 

and audience data in a single, centralized location and permits that data to be used 

to optimize future media buys and assembling “ad creative” for rendering and 

displaying the ads themselves.   

All customer audiences are securely aggregated in the DMP, which connects to its 

demand side platform (“DSP”).  The DSP is a self-service demand side platform 

that utilizes MonaLisa to bid and buy in auction-based online advertising 

marketplaces, allowing advertisers to buy inventory programmatically across social, 

web, mobile, video and native channels. 

As advertising campaign performance is measured, the targeted audience and 

campaign objectives are matched.  Using MonaLisa, additional dynamic target 

audiences are created to further amplify the reach of the ad creative to the optimal 

audiences for a campaign.   

Real-time reporting of advertising efficacy is available through a dashboard, a 

managed service, or through a media strategist.  The dashboard can be used to 

develop communication strategies for potential customers. 



  

 
10 

Additionally, DaVinci 11 has developed a dynamic mobile platform that enables 

mobile-specific optimized customer experiences.  Some of these personalized 

experiences allow the use of voice recognition, voice activated ads and augmented 

reality within the mobile ad-unit.  In many countries, mobile data constitutes over 

50% of internet traffic.  U.S. mobile ad spend is expected to exceed $40 billion – 

and the industry expects that number to exceed $65 billion by 2020.15   

Optimized Advertising for the Crypto-Community 

The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family has created specific audience clusters in the 

DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud specially tailored for the crypto-community, including 

but not limited to: 

Peer Review:  The peer review phase is essential to identify target audiences of a 

blockchain product.  A target audience varies with the objective:  whether to target 

the proposed purchaser of a proposed digital token sale or help identify “peer 

communities” for feedback on the proposed digital token and/or product review. 

Token Planning:  A token sale marketing campaign may be multi-pronged and 

multi-faceted, and DaVinci 11 provides solutions to determine the right combination 

of media channels to achieve marketing campaign objectives.  A planning cycle for 

a token sale digital marketing campaign may require months to build brand 

messaging and market awareness.  Initiating a token sale marketing campaign 

through DaVinci 11 enables aggregation of initial seed audience feedback from 

peer reviews, investors, and consumers, and provides for product launch context 

mapping and aggregating timely stakeholder feedback. 

Token Execution:  During the token sale period, advertisements will be targeted 

and served at high frequencies across multiple platforms to reinforce the 

advertising message and quickly build awareness.  Target audience members 

                                                 

15 See Julie Bernard, “Five Bleeding-Edge Mobile Marketing Trends in 2017,” 
AdvertisingAge.com (Jan. 5, 2017), available at http://adage.com/article/digitalnext/mobile-
marketing-trends-2017/307343/. 



  

 
11 

would include only those likely to be potential purchasers or who have already 

shown interest in the proposed digital token sale. 

Product Adoption:  As a blockchain company is ready to launch its product, the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family will assist in engendering a four-stage life cycle for its 

product adoption, commonly referred to as AIDA:  

(1) Awareness:  Harness brand feedback and 

engagement across channels and devices.  Make 

customer interaction and engagement actionable. 

(2) Interest:  Understand when a customer can be 

influenced.  Leverage real-time audience persona, 

customer habits, and customer brand loyalty value. 

(3) Desire:  Utilize predictive algorithms to identify 

consumer transaction influx. 

(4) Action:  Access customers’ lifetime value to 

implement initiatives that extend customer lifespan 

through brand loyalty, increased visits and 

purchases and development of hyper-targeted 

marketing campaigns. 

MonaLisa:  DaVinci 11’s A.I. Platform  

In early 2017, DaVinci 11 introduced MonaLisa, its deep learning neural network.  

MonaLisa uses machine-learning algorithms and prior behavioral data set analyses 

to improve results in programmatic media advertising and find the best audience.  

MonaLisa predicts ad performance and enables intelligent creative selection to 

enhance the consumer-to-brand connection.  This holistic data repository syncs 

directly with the DAVINCI 11 Delivery Platform for seamless persona (segment) 

activation in a continuous feedback loop that grows and adds new data segments 

as the campaign continues.   

By combining big data sources and applying semantic graph relational analysis and 

machine reasoning algorithms, MonaLisa predicts the intent underlying consumer 

interaction, discovers new predicted behavior patterns, designs and optimizes ad 

creative in real time, makes real time bids on placement inventory, optimizes the 



  

 
12 

 creative based on the selected display medium (i.e., TV, desktop, mobile device) 

and identifies “new” customers.  As MonaLisa’s technology evolves, advertisers 

should be able to optimally describe key performance indicators, ever-growing data 

sets and budget and MonaLisa would structure and deliver a cost-effective and 

transparent marketing campaign within set parameters and without human 

intervention or optimization.  With the A.I. overlay, delivery optimization is not 

limited to time and date for the overall campaign, but can be delivered based on the 

appropriate clusters of audience segments. 

MonaChain:  Reduce Ad Fraud and Build Data Value Using the 

Blockchain:The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family is developing MonaChain, which 

seeks to leverage blockchain technology and a transactional data set to combat 

common varieties of ad fraud.  The varieties of ad fraud targeted by MonaChain 

include: 

Selling Fake Inventory, i.e., Domain Spoofing:  Many advertisers purchase 

placements using algorithms that are not able to identify “look alike” domains that 

may not actually exist, or may have negligible use traffic.  MonaChain will track 

advertising placements, and capture data to allow bidders to identify spoofed sites 

and avoid re-placing useless ads on non-existent or misleading web domains. 

Automatic Refreshing:  Many sites use automated refresh software to create the 

appearance of multiple visitors and multiple impressions.  By tracking IP addresses 

per impression, MonaChain will permit the identification of certain behaviors and 

allow advertisers to avoid placements on offending domains. 

Hidden Ads:  Certain web sites render ads on their pages in a manner so that 

visitors to that page cannot see the ad.  MonaChain will identify domains abusing 

advertisement placement by identifying abnormally high sales volumes on a given 

web domain, so customers may avoid placing ads unlikely to be seen by target 

audiences.  

Proxy Users:  Internet users who mask their geographical information (typically 

derived by IP address) by using proxy servers, VPNs, or anonymizers may imitate 

a unique user in a different location than that user resides, which may degrade the 

value of the placement.  MonaChain will compare a list of sales against industry-

maintained databases of known known proxy users, corporate virtual private 

networks, and/or addresses that allow for user anonymity, to allow users who 



  

 
13 

desire geographically accurate impressions to avoid wasting valuable marketing 

assets. 

Malware:  Hackers and malicious actors have installed malware around the web 

that has infected millions of users to mimic their cookies resulting in programmatic 

exchanges displaying highly lucrative ads to these users,  

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

unbeknownst to the user, which reduces the utility and return from an ad campaign. 

Once MonaChain is successfully implemented and activated, it is expected to result 

in greater efficiency and lower costs for advertisers who will not waste their 

marketing budgets on malware, fraud, and useless intermediaries in the 

programmatic advertising placement system.   

No proceeds from the sale of Lydian tokens will be used for the development of 

MonaChain.  However, once developed, MonaChain will be available to Lydian 

users as set forth in this whitepaper. 

MonaBrowse:  Blockchain-Powered, User-Centered Ad Experiences 

Many internet users have been driven to deploy ad blocking technology because of 

legacy advertising practices like pop ups, uncontrollable video-ads, and other 

intrusive advertising practices.  According to PageFair, an estimated 615 million 



  

 
14 

devices now use adblockers.16  Other estimates suggest that up to 11% of the 

global internet population is blocking ads on the web.17  Adblock usage grew 30% 

globally in 2016,18 and is thought to reach up to 380 million mobile devices.  

Desktop adblock usage grew by 34 million to reach 236 million devices.19  

In 2016, PageFair predicted the global cost of ad blocking would rise to $41.4 

billion for publishers.  Preventing ad-blocking would increase publisher revenue and 

add to the already-existing $232 billion digital advertising industry. 

Through MonaBrowse, Lydian users may negotiate Lydian tokens to Lydian who 

will customize that Lydian user’s browsing experience so they may opt to see no 

advertisement content, or only certain selected content while browsing.  Through 

the proposed MonaBrowse system, publishers would continue to receive payment 

for their placements, but the Lydian user would enjoy their Internet browsing 

experience without distracting or unwanted advertising content, and without 

adjusting their Internet browsing behavior or downloading newly created browsers.  

The MonaBrowse system will have additional capabilities, including with respect to 

developing data mining applications and tools, among other things. 

No proceeds from the sale of Lydian tokens will be used for the development of 

MonaBrowse.   

Whisper Network Protocol (WNP) 

Lydian's two products, MonaChain and MonaBrowse will now utilize the DAG 

protocol on a model called Whisper Network Protocol (WNP). WNP supports the 

speed, security, and consensus while transactions fees are kept to a minimum. 

This model uses each transaction on its chain to solve the ones prior. As additional 

transactions are conducted on the chain, the process moves through quicker 

enabling all transaction to be validated within seconds. This increase in speed is 

critical for digital marketing platform as programmatic platforms require a full cycle 

response to be under 100 milliseconds, including receiving the bid request and 

serving the ad, using a real-time bidding platforms. 

                                                 

16 See PageFair, 2017 Adblock Report:  The state of the blocked web (Feb. 2017), available 
at https://pagefair.com/blog/2017/adblockreport/. 

17 See id.   

18 See id.   

19 See id.   



  

 
15 

WNP solves for the speed and alleviates the security scalability; These factors are 

alleviated as the network infrastructure and capacity increase. 

What Is Lydian? 

The Lydian Token 

The name “Lydian” pays homage to the first human civilization to use currency, 

though Lydian tokens are not a currency; they represent a new model for the 

delivery of existing technology-driven marketing services.   

The Lydian token is an ERC20-compatible20 token, leveraging the Ethereum 

blockchain for broad compatibility with existing wallets, exchanges, development 

tools, smart contracts, exchanges and other associated technology infrastructure.  

The Ethereum ecosystem has been in development since 2015 and offers the 

ability to deploy Turing-complete trustless smart contracts on top of its blockchain.  

This flexibility and extensibility has made the ERC20 token interface the most 

frequently used token issuance standard. 

The Lydian token may be purchased using Bitcoin (BTC), Ethereum (ETH), Litecoin 

(LTC), Dash (DASH), ZCash (ZEC), Waves (WAVES), other cryptocurrencies, and 

fiat currencies via wire transfer.  By making the Lydian token available to 

purchasers through a wider spectrum of payment channels, Lydian intends to make 

its products and services and, in turn, the blockchain ecosystem, accessible to 

consumers who believe the space outside their grasp.  

The Lydian token is intended to serve as a payment marker for access to services 

provided by LydianCoin SG and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family.  As further 

described herein, Lydian and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family constantly strive to 

innovate and intend to continue to make additional products and services available 

to Lydian users in the future but at prices to be determined.   

The Lydian token is intended to be exchanged with LydianCoin SG only for the 

services to be provided by LydianCoin SG and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family, 

and holders of the Lydian token do not have any right of redemption against 

LydianCoin SG for the Lydian token save for this purpose. 

                                                 

20 An explanation of the ERC20 token standard is available at 
https://theethereum.wiki/w/index.php/ERC20_Token_Standard. 



  

 
16 

Purchasers are not and will not be entitled, to vote or receive dividends or be 

deemed the holder of capital stock of LydianCoin SG or any other member of 

the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family for any purpose, nor will anything be 

construed to confer on the purchasers any of the rights of a stockholder of 

LydianCoin SG or any other member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family or 

any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to 

stockholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any 

corporate action or to receive notice of meetings, or to receive subscription 

rights or otherwise.  Holders of Lydian tokens will have no right to participate 

in the profits of any member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family, share in the 

income of any member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family or otherwise 

receive any payment or return from of any member of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family solely by virtue of owning or holding a Lydian token.  

Holders of Lydian tokens do not have, in any form whatsoever, any proprietary 

interest or rights to the assets or properties of LydianCoin SG or any other member 

of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family.  No intellectual property rights in any software, 

data sets, or other art of any kind created by or intended to be used by any member 

of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family will be granted to any holder of a Lydian token 

solely by virtue of owning or holding a Lydian token. 

Token Distribution 

200,000,000 Lydian tokens will be offered for sale to purchasers in this offering, as 

set forth below.  Purchasers should note that 10,000 Lydian tokens are required to 

create a user account.  Certain products and services offered through or by the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family are available in exchange for Lydian tokens without a 

user account.  There is a minimum purchase amount of seventy (70) Lydian tokens 

per purchase.      

Lydian tokens have been or shall be sold in “Lots”, as set forth below.  With respect 

to purchasers of Lot 1 through Lot 5, purchases shall be made in accordance with 

the table set forth below.   

LydianCoin SG will retain 200,000,000 of the total 400,000,000 tokens for future 

issuance.  Up to 2% of the retained tokens held by LydianCoin SG will be 

distributed to advisors to LydianCoin SG at the company’s sole and exclusive 

discretion.  Certain additional retained tokens shall be distributed in accordance 

with the bounty program set forth below.   



  

 
17 

 

In conjunction with any purchase of Lydian tokens, each Lydian token purchaser 

will be required to make certain representations, including that it intends to acquire 

the tokens solely for the purpose of exchange for digital marketing and advertising 

services from the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family, as set forth herein, and not with a 

view toward the further transfer, resale, or distribution of the tokens.  Please see 

Section 6, Risk Factors, for information on the risks associated with purchasing 

Lydian tokens.   

Payment 

Lydian tokens may be purchased using Bitcoin (BTC), Bitcoin Cash (BCH), Dash 

(DASH), Dogecoin (DOGE), Ethereum (ETH), Ethereum Classic (ETC), Lisk (LSK), 

Litecoin (LTC), Nem (XEM), Neo (NEO), Qtum (QTUM), Ripple (XRP), Tether 

(USDT), Waves (WAVES), ZCash (ZEC), PayPal for ACH and fiat currenices via 

wire transfer.  

Bounty Campaign  

Commencing during the pre-sale period on October 26, 2017, and ending simultaneously 

with the offering of Lydian tokens, LydianCoin is sponsoring a bounty campaign (the 

“Bounty Campaign”) to reward early LydianCoin supporters.  500,000 Lydian tokens are 

reserved for payment of bounties, in accordance with the following distribution structure: 

Social Media: Facebook, Twitter & 
Instagram 

100,000 
LDN 

Blog, YouTube & Similar Media: 100,000 
LDN 

Wearing of Signature Code/Avatar & Forum 
Promotion: 

100,000 
LDN 

Translation of ANN & Whitepaper: 75,000 LDN 

Translation of Website: 75,000 LDN 

Telegram Participation: 25,000 LDN 

 

Complete information regarding and the Terms and Conditions of the Bounty 

Campaign are available at: https://lydian.io 

https://lydian.io/


  

 
18 

Referral Program 

Additional Lydian tokens can be obtained by promoting LydianCoin promotional 

materials regarding the sale of Lydian tokens.  Upon joining the Lydian referral 

program, participants will be supplied with a range of graphics and textual links that 

can be placed within participants’ sites, socials and other platforms.  Participants 

will receive a commission of [5%] of total sales volume referred through their 

unique links, paid in Lydian tokens.    

  



  

 
19 

Lydian Token Sale - Key Data 

Token Issuer: LydianCoin SG, a Singaporean 
entity 

Total Tokens: 400,000,000 

Tokens to Be Sold via Token 
Sale(s): 

200,000,000 

Tokens to Be Provided to 
Advisors: 

Up to 800,000 at LydianCoin SG’s 
sole discretion 

Tokens to Be Provided via Bounty 
Campaign 

500,000 from reserves 

Short Name: LDN 

Currency Accepted: Bitcoin (BTC), Bitcoin Cash (BCH), 
Dash (DASH), Dogecoin (DOGE), 
Ethereum (ETH), Ethereum Classic 
(ETC), Lisk (LSK), Litecoin (LTC), 
Nem (XEM), Neo (NEO), Qtum 
(QTUM), Ripple (XRP), Tether 
(USDT), Waves (WAVES), ZCash 
(ZEC), PayPal for ACH, and credit 
cards 

Price per LDN: BTC, BCH, DASH, DOGE, ETH, 
ETC, LSK, LTC, XEM, NEO, GTUM, 
XRP, USDT, WAVES and ZEC in an 
amount equal to $0.50 USD per LDN  

Type: Ethereum ERC20-based 

Token Sale Start: Private Presale           Concluded 

Lot 1                       Oct 31, 2017 

Lot 2          Nov 20, 2018 

Lot 3          Dec 15, 2017 

Lot 4          Jan 1, 2018 

Lot 5          Jan 15, 2018 

Public Crowdsale      Jan 30, 2018 



  

 
20 

Token Sale Structure: Lot 1 25% discount 10,000,000 
tokens 

Lot 2 20% discount 15,000,000 
tokens 

Lot 3 15% discount 20,000,000 
tokens 

Lot 4 10% discount 25,000,000 
tokens 

Lot 5 5% discount 30,000,000 
tokens 

Public Crowdsale Remaining 
tokens 

Fundraising Goal: Approximately $100,000,000.00 
USD  

Use of Proceeds: Reserved against the cost of 
providing future digital advertising 
and marketing services 

  



  

 
21 

Use of Token Sale Proceeds 

100% of the proceeds raised by the sale of Lydian tokens will be held by 

LydianCoin SG (in fiat currency or cryptocurrency, as financial, security, and other 

considerations may demand) as reserves against the cost of services to be 

performed for Lydian token holders upon negotiation of the token back to 

LydianCoin SG.  All costs of the proposed sale of the Lydian tokens will be paid by 

the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family, and no proceeds from the sale of Lydian 

tokens will be used to cover sale costs, including marketing, legal, or 

management fees.  No development costs for any product to be developed or in 

development by any member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family will be paid out of 

the proceeds of the sale of Lydian tokens.   

Lydian tokens will be negotiable only for the digital marketing and advertising 

services available from the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family, in accordance with the 

pricing schedule for services, provided on the prepaid services contracts to be 

announced and available with the sale of Lydian tokens, and Lydian token holders 

will not be entitled to any other return of funds or other benefit solely by virtue of 

ownership of the Lydian tokens.   

Lydian-Fueled Marketing 

Lydian tokens may at any time be transferred back to LydianCoin SG in exchange 

for services and products, specifically described in and at the rates indicated on the 

prepaid digital advertising and marketing technology, products, and services 

contracts available with the sale of Lydian tokens (the “Menu”).  Lydian tokens are 

negotiated back to LydianCoin SG at the equivalent value for which they were 

purchased, $0.50 USD.  A representative sample of technology, products and 

services available from the Menu include the following:   

Item Description Fiat Cost Lydian 
Value 

Account 
Setup 

Account setup for 
programmatic audience 
targeting 

$5,000/account 10,000 
LDN 

Advertising 
Slot 

One advertising space $5/space 10 LDN 



  

 
22 

Trim URL shortening tool with 
vanity domain 
capabilities and rich 
engagement analytics  

$1000/brand/month 2,000 
LDN 

Add.Now 
Pro 

Content sharing tool that 
syncs with social media 
and organic (cut and 
paste) sharing  

$500/brand/month 1,000 
LDN 

ReachMe 
Pro 

Social media 
management software 
that automates control 
and provides rich 
analytics and insights 

$1000/account/month 2,000 
LDN 

CRM.me Customer relationship 
management software 
powered with 
gamification 

$35/user/month 70 LDN 

Deliver.me Email design and 
delivery with deep 
integrations into CRM 
workflows  

$10,000/account/month 20,000 
LDN 

Unify.me Mobile SDK and 
analytics package  

$1000/account/month 2,000 
LDN 

Spot.u Platform with the ability 
to serve dynamic 
creative/ advertising into 
any HTML email 
platform 

$10,000/account/month 20,000 
LDN 

RM5 Powerfully engaging, full 
screen, interactive 
mobile interstitials 
powered by HTML5 

$10,000/account/month 20,000 
LDN 



  

 
23 

 

All Menu items may be purchased using (i) LDN or (ii) a combination of BTC, ETH, 

LTC, DASH, ZEC, WAVES, and/or fiat currency.  An electronic insertion order will 

formalize the terms of the services to be provided and commence the advertising 

campaign.  If Design Creative services are purchased, LydianCoin SG and other 

members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family will design the initial creative assets 

in consultation with the client.  Additional Lydian tokens may be used to purchase 

impressions at the rates to be negotiated or announced in connection with future 

prepaid services contracts, which are expected to vary depending on the audience 

group, channel and type of service requested.  Advertising materials are trafficked 

into the DAVINCI 11 Marketing Cloud, powered by MonaLisa, and served to the 

relevant audiences across multiple channels.  Real-time reporting of advertising 

efficacy is available to Lydian users through a dashboard, a managed service, or a 

media strategist.   

Central to DaVinci 11’s strategy in delivering targeted digital marketing services is 

its ability to mine ad exchanges for the optimal audiences and impressions for its 

customers.  As discussed above, DaVinci 11 relies on its proprietary A.I. 

technology, MonaLisa, to refine the ongoing flow of data from the continual auction 

in the ad exchanges.  In ad exchanges, bidders such as DaVinci 11 compete in real 

time for impressions, or views, created by users visiting a given webpage.  

Leveraging Mona Lisa together with the weight of its institutional data and 

relationships with partners, DaVinci 11 can identify proper target audiences for 

clients and seed their content to the right places at the right times.   

DaVinci 11’s ability to match marketing content to impressions, or “eyeballs,” is 

contingent upon the availability of those impressions, as well as the price of those 

impressions.  In a low-supply or high-price environment in ad exchanges, DaVinci 

11 may have higher costs to pass along to customers.  Conversely, a high-supply 

The Genesis 
Pro 

Enterprise social media 
app for the 
entertainment & music 
industries; captures real 
time social media 
audience data to target 
fans 

$1000/brand/month 5,000 
LDN 

Design 
Creative 

Custom designed 
creative unique to the 
product targeting/ 
audience 

$15,000/account/month 30,000 
LDN 



  

 
24 

or low-price environment will have lower costs.  The real-time purchase/delivery 

nature of ad exchanges prevents DaVinci 11 or other purchasers from buying 

during a low-cost period and storing.   

All prices, fiat and LDN, are subject to change at any time at the sole discretion of 

the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family.   

Why Purchase Services with Lydian Tokens Instead of Fiat Currency? 

LydianCoin SG’s technology, products, and services are licensed from the DaVinci 

11 Corporate Family and are otherwise available to be purchased in fiat currency.  

Why use Lydian tokens?  

Crypto-specific advertising profiles are only available for 

users of Lydian tokens. 

DaVinci 11 has identified audience segments specifically optimized for 

cryptocurrency and blockchain businesses based upon DaVinci 11’s 

existing internal data collection systems.  These specific crypto community 

audience profiles include profiles for prospective investors and prospective 

consumers of blockchain technology and blockchain-related products.  

These target audience profiles will be available exclusively to purchasers 

using Lydian tokens and not available to customers paying solely in fiat. 

100% of the consideration provided for Lydian tokens will be 

used to provide client services.  

Unlike most token sales that promise future products in exchange for 

current funding used to develop those products, Lydian holders will be able 

to access services already used globally by household brands.  100% of 

the purchase price of Lydian will be provided back to the Lydian token 

holder in the form of advertising and marketing services to be provided at 

the expected rates and amounts otherwise set forth in the contract such 

purchaser enters with LydianCoin SG upon negotiating its Lydian tokens.  

No proceeds of the Lydian token purchase will be spent on 

research and development, future products such as 



  

 
25 

MonaChain and MonaBrowse, marketing, legal costs, or 

payment of intermediaries.   

Unlike many other ventures in the digital advertising space, Lydian and the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family do not need to leverage the proposed token 

sale to onboard publishers to obtain critical market and consumer data to 

establish that the services offered are effective.  Many of LydianCoin’s and 

the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family’s services described here will be available 

on the date of token distribution.21 

Users of Lydian will have preferred access to advanced 

systems in development by Lydian and/or DaVinci 11, 

including MonaChain and MonaBrowse. 

Users who obtain services using Lydian tokens will be provided with 

exclusive access to DaVinci 11 projects under development at DaVinci 11 

Labs for a limited period (to be determined and announced by LydianCoin 

SG).  These projects include the MonaChain and MonaBrowse projects 

described herein.  Lydian’s progress on MonaChain and MonaBrowse will 

be periodically updated on the Lydian web site. 

The use of Lydian tokens will support and reinforce the 

crypto-community in the following ways (among others): 

Purchasing services through the negotiation of a native cryptocurrency 

rather than payment in fiat supports the maturity, development, and stability 

of cryptocurrencies and benefits the crypto-community as a whole.  

Industry estimates suggest that as of August 1, 2017, more than $1.3 

billion has been raised by ICOs and token sales.22  Much of this fundraising 

is collected in cryptocurrencies.  Newly funded ventures may be reluctant 

to liquidate large sums of cryptocurrencies into fiat to purchase services 

based on speculative business considerations, or based on cultural or 

philosophical concerns.  Large-scale crypto-financing events by 

                                                 

21 Token purchasers should consult with a LydianCoin SG representative regarding available 
services upon transacting its Lydian tokens. 

22 See Chris O’Brien, “ICOs have raised more than $1.3 billion so far in 2017,” 
VentureBeat.com (Aug. 7, 2017), available at https://venturebeat.com/2017/08/07/icos-have-
raised-more-than-1-3-billion-so-far-in-2017/. 



  

 
26 

themselves tend to correlate with depressed crypto-asset valuations,23 and 

subsequent liquidation events by new ventures may exaggerate those 

adverse effects on cryptocurrency valuation, contribute to price volatility, 

and thereby result in a reduction of enterprise value for post-ICO 

companies.24 

By introducing marketplace-tested products and services into the 

cryptocurrency space via the Lydian token, Lydian hopes to stabilize and 

provide additional value to crypto markets.  The DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family’s provision of goods and services to be paid for in cryptocurrencies 

by new ventures backed by crypto-assets is intended to fortify the crypto-

asset economy and further strengthen the value of crypto-based tokens.25   

The use of Lydian tokens within the crypto- community will allow Lydian and 

DaVinci 11 to create the above noted specific crypto-user marketing profile which 

will iteratively enhance the value of the Lydian tokens to consumers in the 

cryptocurrency space who want to focus their advertising and marketing messaging 

to those within the cryptocurrency space, and others who may be target consumers 

for crypto-industry services and products.  Lydian token holders will have exclusive 

access to crypto-specific audience targeting for an initial period. 

 

 

 

                                                 

23 See “Do ICOs Temporarily Cause Ethereum’s Price to Fall?” Trustnodes.com (June 25, 
2017) available at http://www.trustnodes.com/2017/06/25/icos-temporarily-cause-ethereums-
price-fall.    

24 See Olusegun Ogundeji, “Major Startups Whose ICOs Tanked Ethereum Price Will Help 
Raise It Again,” TheCointelegraph.com (Jul. 24, 2017), available at 
https://cointelegraph.com/news/major-startups-whose-icos-tanked-ethereum-price-will-help-
raise-it-again; see also Arjun Kharpal, “Ethereum briefly crashed from $319 to 10 cents in 
seconds on one exchange after ‘multimillion dollar’ trade,” CNBC.com (June 22, 2017), 
available at https://www.cnbc.com/2017/06/22/ethereum-price-crash-10-cents-gdax-
exchange-after-multimillion-dollar-trade.html.  Unlike traditional stock exchanges, virtual 
currency markets do not have circuit breakers that can stop trading in case of sharp 
downward valuation events.  See “Should Cryptocurrency Exchanges Have Circuit Breakers 
in Place to Stop Crashes,” SteemitBeta.com (June 2017), available at 
https://steemit.com/cryptocurrency/@npl77/should-cryptocurrency-exchanges-have-circuit-
breakers-in-place-to-stop-crashes.   

25 See William Mougayar, “The Theory of a Blockchain Circular Economy,” Coindesk.com 
(Aug. 6, 2016), available at https://www.coindesk.com/the-theory-of-a-blockchain-circular-
economy-and-the-future-of-work/. 

https://steemit.com/cryptocurrency/@npl77/should-cryptocurrency-exchanges-have-circuit-breakers-in-place-to-stop-crashes
https://steemit.com/cryptocurrency/@npl77/should-cryptocurrency-exchanges-have-circuit-breakers-in-place-to-stop-crashes


  

 
27 

Management 

Lydian’s executive and management team collectively has decades of experience 

in the digital advertising industry.   

Kamal Kaur is the Co-Founder, Chairwoman & CEO, and has been an industry 

veteran for nearly 20 years in the advertising ecosystem. She has held a number of 

high-tech senior management positions in Silicon Valley and holds a solid track 

record in building profitable companies, creating global products and cross-

functional teams. She was the co-founder of BlueLithium, acquired by Yahoo! in 

2007. She has a stellar start-up track record and is revered as an expert in the 

digital marketing space. Her passion resides in building products & platforms, using 

cutting-edge emerging technologies and starting teams from ground zero. She 

holds an extensive experience leading cross-functional product and global 

engineering teams in many of the valley’s top firms. Her passion remains rooted in 

the emerging technologies. Kamal is a graduate of Stanford University, School of 

Business. She is pursuing her Doctoral degree with a dissertation focused on the 

disruptive technologies in the Science of Machine Learning.  

Kevin Huang is the Managing Director for the Asia Pacific region.  Mr. Huang has 

over 18 years of experience.  Prior to DaVinci 11, Mr. Huang was CEO of Pixels, 

one of the largest independent multi-screen advertising technology companies in 

Asia, acquired by DaVinci 11 in November 2015.  Before co-founding Pixels, Mr. 

Huang held positions at 247 Media Asia and DoubleClick Media Asia.  Mr. Huang 

was awarded Digital Marketing Hero 2014 by the Hong Kong Association of 

Interactive Marketing and Finalist, Young Entrepreneur Award 2015 by the South 

China Morning Post.  Mr. Huang is a graduate of Pace University with a degree in 

Computer Information Systems. 

Nick Jerzembeck is the UK Commercial Director and brings 10+ years of 

substantial experience in sales and business development to the UK team. He is 

responsible for developing and driving strategies that leverage company’s exclusive 

partnerships and technology assets into sustainable, mainstream business. He is 

also focused on developing and bringing to market innovative Programmatic 

solutions for the premium partners and large media companies. He is also focused 

on developing and bringing to market innovative Programmatic solutions for the 

premium partners and large media companies. 



  

 
28 

Belinda Montes is the CFO for DaVinci II’s Asia operations and responsible for all 

finance and administration functions of the Asia business. Belinda is a co-founder 

of Pixels, acquired by DaVinci II Inc to form the core of its Asia business. 

Previously, Belinda was the Regional Finance Director of DoubleClick Media Hong 

Kong, and before this she managed the finance department for Time Life Asia. She 

is a seasoned executive with experience in building and leading Finance and 

Business Planning teams. Belinda is a Certified Public Accountant in Hong Kong 

and in the Philippines. She holds a Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration 

from University of the East, Manila. She also holds a Masters from City University, 

Hong Kong. 

Claire Kim is the Head of Sales in the UK. Claire’s role is to drive revenue growth 

across direct and programmatic channels through leadership, sales strategy, and 

continuous team development. Claire’s experience working in media and 

advertising spans across 9 years from Australia to the UK. She has experience 

working in tier 1 to boutique media agencies, radio and digital solutions from 

account management right through to content integration and media sales. 

Imran Khaliq is our General Counsel and comes to DaVinci II with a background 

as a high stakes commercial litigator, transactional attorney, and partner at major 

national and international law firms. He was recently a senior director of intellectual 

property and litigation at a publicly traded media-tech company where he handled 

multi-million-dollar patent litigation and licensing deals. Imran’s experience and 

expertise spans corporate and securities matters, intellectual property, employment 

issues, compliance and litigation before federal, state and administrative courts. 

Imran is an honors graduate of the University of San Francisco, School of Law.  

Simon Apperly is the head of Business Development, Australia & New Zealand. 

Prior to this, he founded Spotu Digital which is a dynamic email ad serving platform 

which is used across APAC by Airlines, Loyalty programs and Travel aggregators. 

Simon is a solutions-based analyst with a zest for life having recently completed the 

Gobi Desert Ultramarathon. With over 13 year’s experience in developing and 

building various Media companies, Simon has a wealth of knowledge creating 

Ancillary revenue for Publishers across all facets of digital media. Simon is a 

member of the NZ Institute of Directors.  

The Company also has 12 industry advisors across the globe leading their block 

chain efforts. Their bios can be viewed on the Lydian.io website. 

  

https://lydian.io/


  

 
29 

RISK FACTORS 

A purchase of Lydian tokens involves a high degree of risk.  You should 

consider carefully the risks described below, together with all of the other 

information contained in this Whitepaper, before making a decision to 

purchase.  The following risks entail circumstances under which, the DaVinci 

11 Corporate Family’s business, financial condition, results of operations and 

prospects could suffer. 

Participation in token sales, including the Lydian token sale, involves a high 

degree of risk. 

Financial and operating risks confronting marketing and technology companies like 

LydianCoin SG and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family may be significant.  The 

digital advertising and media markets are highly competitive and the percentage of 

companies that survive and prosper may be limited.  Unexpected problems in the 

areas of product development, marketing, financing and general management, 

among others, that cannot be solved may arise. 

General risks associated with the business of LydianCoin SG and the DaVinci 

11 Corporate Family. 

LydianCoin SG and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family offer highly complex services 

and products and face competition that may result in a loss of market share and/or 

a decline in profitability.  LydianCoin SG and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family 

expect the marketplace to continue to be highly competitive as new products 

develop, industry standards become well known and other competitors attempt to 

enter the markets in which the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family operates.  Some 

competitors may have longer operating histories, and, when viewed globally, larger 

customer bases and significantly greater financial, sales and marketing, 

manufacturing, distribution, technical and other capabilities than the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family.  These competitors may be able to adapt more quickly to new or 

emerging technological requirements and changes in customer and/or regulatory 

requirements.  They may also be able to devote greater resources to the promotion 

and sale of their products and services.  Competition from newly established 

competitors may also enter the marketplace and further materially adversely affect 

the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family.  Existing or new competitors may develop 

products, technologies or services that more effectively address the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family’s markets with enhanced features and functionality, greater levels 



  

 
30 

of integration and/or lower cost.  Additionally, changes or developments in 

technology could render the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family’s offered products and 

services dated or obsolete or cause them to lose market acceptance, which could 

have a material adverse impact on business performance.  As the technological 

sophistication of its competitors and the size of the market increase, competing 

low-cost producers could emerge and grow stronger.  All of these risks may lead to 

diminished opportunity and/or marginal utility in purchasers exchanging Lydian 

tokens for prepaid advertising services. 

Risks associated with financial reporting. 

There may be material weaknesses in our internal control over financial reporting 

as well as significant deficiencies in our disclosure controls and procedures, and we 

may identify material weaknesses in internal controls or significant deficiencies in 

our disclosure controls and procedures in the future.  If we fail to remediate any 

identified material weaknesses, or if we otherwise fail to maintain effective internal 

control over financial reporting and disclosure controls and procedures, we may not 

be able to accurately report our financial results, or detect or prevent fraud in a 

timely manner, which may, among other adverse consequences, cause our 

customers to lose confidence.  A “material weakness” is a deficiency, or a 

combination of deficiencies, in internal control over financial reporting such that 

there is a reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of our annual or 

interim financial statements will not be prevented or detected on a timely basis.   

Interruptions in IT systems could materially adversely affect business 

performance. 

The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family is entirely dependent on the secure operation of 

its websites and systems as well as the operation of the Internet generally.  Its 

business may involve the storage and transmission of customers’ proprietary 

information, and security breaches could expose the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family 

to a risk of loss or misuse of this information, and to resulting claims and litigation.  

A number of large Internet companies have suffered security breaches, many of 

which have involved intentional attacks.  From time to time the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family and many other Internet businesses also experience denial of 

service attacks in which attackers attempt to block customers’ access to any or all 

of its product, software and platforms, including but not limited to its website.   



  

 
31 

If the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family is unable to avert a denial of service attack for 

any significant period, it could sustain substantial revenue loss from lost sales and 

customer dissatisfaction.  The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family may not have the 

resources or technical sophistication to anticipate or prevent rapidly evolving types 

of cyber-attacks.  Cyber-attacks may target the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family, its 

customers, its suppliers, banks, credit card processors, delivery services, e-

commerce in general or the communication infrastructure on which it depends.  If 

an actual or perceived attack or breach of its security occurs, customer and/or 

supplier perception of the effectiveness of its security measures could be harmed 

and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family could lose customers, suppliers or both.  

Actual or anticipated attacks and risks may cause the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family 

to incur increasing costs, including costs to deploy additional personnel and 

protection technologies, train employees, and engage third party experts and 

consultants. 

A person who is able to circumvent security measures might be able to 

misappropriate its or its customers’ proprietary information, cause interruption in 

operations, damage computers or those of customers, or otherwise damage 

reputation and business.  Any compromise of security could result in a violation of 

applicable privacy and other laws, significant legal and financial exposure, damage 

to its reputation, and a loss of confidence in security measures, which could harm 

the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family’s business. 

Any significant interruption to the efficient and uninterrupted operation the DaVinci 

11 Corporate Family’s information technology applications, systems and networks, 

including, but not limited to, new system implementations, facility issues or energy 

blackouts, could have a material adverse impact on the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family’s operations and operating results.  The protective measures adopted to 

avoid system or network disruptions may be insufficient to prevent or limit the 

damage from any future disruptions, and any such disruption could have an 

adverse effect on LydianCoin SG’s and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family’s 

business, financial condition and results of operations.  All of these risks may lead 

to diminished opportunity and/or marginal utility in purchasers exchanging Lydian 

tokens for prepaid advertising services. 

Risks associated with intellectual property. 

We may in the future be subject to intellectual property or other claims, which are 

costly to defend, could result in significant damage awards, and could limit our 



  

 
32 

ability to use certain technologies in the future.  In the future we may have patent, 

copyright, and trademark infringement lawsuits filed against us claiming that certain 

of our products, services, and technologies infringe the intellectual property rights 

of others.  Adverse results in any of these lawsuits may include awards of 

substantial monetary damages, costly royalty or licensing agreements (if licenses 

are available at all), or orders preventing us from offering certain features, 

functionalities, products, or services, and may also cause us to change our 

business practices, and require development of non-infringing products or 

technologies, which could result in a loss of revenues for us and otherwise harm 

our business. 

Intellectual property claims are often time consuming, expensive to litigate or settle, 

and cause significant diversion of management attention.  To the extent such 

intellectual property infringement claims are successful, they may have an adverse 

effect on our business.  Our intellectual property rights are valuable, and any 

inability to protect them could reduce the value of our products and services.  Our 

intellectual property rights are important assets for us.  Various events outside of 

our control pose a threat to our intellectual property rights, as well as to our 

products, services and technologies.  For example, effective intellectual property 

protection may not be available in every country in which our products and services 

are distributed or made available.  Also, the efforts we have taken to protect our 

proprietary rights may not be sufficient or effective.  We also seek to maintain 

certain intellectual property as trade secrets. The secrecy could be compromised 

by outside parties, or by our employees, which could cause us to lose the 

competitive advantage resulting from these trade secrets.  

Any significant impairment of our intellectual property rights could harm our 

business and our ability to compete.    

Risks associated with legal proceedings. 

The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family undertakes global business operations and is 

involved from time to time in disputes, including lawsuits and other legal 

proceedings, and investigations by relevant authorities. It is possible that such 

cases may arise in the future.  

Due to the differences in judicial systems and the uncertainties inherent in such 

proceedings, the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family may be subject to a ruling requiring 

payment of amounts far exceeding its expectations.  Any judgment or decision 



  

 
33 

unfavorable to the Group could also have a material adverse effect on the DaVinci 

11 Corporate Family’s business.  In addition, due to various circumstances, there 

can be no assurance that lawsuits involving claims for large sums will not be 

brought, even if the possibility of receiving orders for such payment is quite low. 

Risks associated with international operations. 

LydianCoin SG and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family are subject to numerous 

evolving and complex laws and regulations which apply, among other things, to 

financial reporting standards, corporate governance, data privacy, tax, competitive 

practices and regulations in each jurisdiction in which they operate.  In the 

jurisdictions in which they operate, each respective member of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family would need to comply with various standards and practices of 

different regulatory, tax, judicial and administrative bodies.  There are a number of 

risks associated with international business operations, including political instability 

(e.g., the threat of war, terrorist attacks or civil unrest), inconsistent regulations 

across jurisdictions, unanticipated changes in the regulatory environment, and 

import and export restrictions.  Any of these events may affect its employees, 

reputation, business or financial results as well as its ability to meet its objectives, 

including the following international business risks: 

negative economic developments in economies around the world and the instability 

of governments, or the downgrades in the debt ratings of certain major economies; 

social and political instability; 

complex regulations governing certain of its products; 

potential terrorist attacks; 

adverse changes in governmental policies, especially those affecting trade and 

investment; 

foreign currency exchange; and 

threats that its operations or property could be subject to nationalization and 

expropriation. 

 

 



  

 
34 

All members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family may not be in full compliance at all 

times with the laws and regulations to which each such member of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family is subject.  Likewise, the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family may not 

have obtained or may not be able to obtain the permits and other authorizations or 

licenses that it would need.  If any member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family 

violates or fails to comply with laws, regulations, permits, health and safety 

regulations or other authorizations or licenses, it could be fined or otherwise 

sanctioned by regulators.  In such a case, or if any of these international business 

risks were to materialize, the business, financial condition and results of operations, 

and thus the utility of the Lydian tokens, could be adversely affected. 

LydianCoin SG and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family may be forced to cease 

operations or take actions that result in a dissolution event. 

It is possible that, due to any number of reasons, including, but not limited to, an 

unfavorable fluctuation in the value of cryptographic and fiat currencies, the inability 

by LydianCoin SG to establish the Lydian tokens’ utility, the failure of commercial 

relationships, intellectual property ownership challenges, inability to service debt or 

meet obligations as they come due in the ordinary course of business or 

governmental or regulatory actions or proceedings, LydianCoin SG and/or the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family may no longer be viable to operate and may dissolve 

or take actions that result in a dissolution event.  In such an event, purchasers 

should be aware that the Lydian token does not in any way whatsoever grant any 

rights to any assets, rights or properties of LydianCoin SG or the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family, save for any rights arising from or related to negotiation of the 

Lydian token to LydianCoin SG in exchange for services and products as described 

herein. 

The loss of key personnel or any inability to attract and retain additional 

personnel could affect the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family’s ability to 

successfully grow its business. 

The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family’s performance is substantially dependent on the 

continued services and on the performance of its senior management and other 

key personnel.  The loss of the services, of any such person for any reason, 

including due to pending or future legal proceedings, could harm the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family’s business.  The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family’s future success 

also depends on its ability to identify, attract, hire, train, retain and motivate other 

highly-skilled technical, managerial, editorial, merchandising, marketing and 



  

 
35 

customer service personnel.  Competition for such personnel is intense.  The failure 

to retain and attract the necessary technical, managerial, editorial, merchandising, 

marketing and customer service personnel could harm the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family’s business and thus affect the ability of purchasers of Lydian tokens to 

exchange the tokens for services. 

The regulatory regime governing the blockchain technologies, 

cryptocurrencies, tokens and token sales such as Lydian tokens is uncertain 

or nonexistent in many jurisdictions, and new regulations or policies may 

materially adversely affect the development of the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family’s exchange of Lydian tokens for services. 

As blockchain networks and blockchain assets have grown in popularity and in 

market size, federal and state agencies have begun to take interest in, and in some 

cases regulate, their use and operation. 

Regulation of tokens (including Lydian tokens) and token sales such as this, 

cryptocurrencies, blockchain technologies and cryptocurrency exchanges is largely 

undeveloped and likely to rapidly evolve, varies significantly among international, 

federal, state and local jurisdictions and is subject to significant uncertainty in legal 

and regulatory interpretation and enforcement.  Various legislative and executive 

bodies in the United States and in other countries may in the future, adopt laws, 

regulations, guidance, or other actions, which may materially adversely affect or 

otherwise severely impact the development and growth of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family and the adoption and utility of Lydian tokens.  Failure of any party 

to comply with any laws, rules and regulations, some of which may not exist yet or 

are subject to interpretation and may be subject to change, could result in a variety 

of adverse consequences, including criminal and civil penalties, suspension of 

trading and fines. 

In the case of virtual currencies, state regulators like the New York Department of 

Financial Services have created new regulatory frameworks.  Others, as in Texas, 

have published guidance on how their existing regulatory regimes apply to virtual 

currencies.  Some states, including but not limited to New Hampshire, North 

Carolina, Illinois, Hawaii, California, Florida and Washington, have amended or are 

in discussions to amend their state’s statutes to address licensing, exchange and 

other regulatory matters.  Treatment of virtual currencies continues to evolve under 

United States federal law as well.  In the US, the Department of the Treasury, the 

Securities Exchange Commission and the Commodity Futures Trading 



  

 
36 

Commission, for example, have published guidance on the treatment of virtual 

currencies.  The IRS released guidance treating virtual currency as property that is 

not currency for US federal income tax purposes, although there is no indication yet 

whether other courts or federal or state regulators will follow this classification.  

Both federal and state agencies have instituted enforcement actions against those 

violating their interpretation of existing laws. 

The regulation of non-currency use of blockchain assets is also uncertain.  The 

United States Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”) has issued a 

public report stating federal securities laws require treating some blockchain assets 

as securities.  On December 11, 2017, the SEC instituted cease-and-desist 

proceedings against Munchee, Inc. (“Munchee”).  In October and November 2017, 

Munchee offered and sold digital tokens characterized as utility tokens to the 

general public, including in the United States, without filing a registration statement 

as required by United States securities laws.26  The SEC found, “Even if MUN 

tokens had a practical use at the time of the offering, it would not preclude the 

token from being a security.  Determining whether a transaction involves a security 

does not turn on labelling – such as characterizing an ICO as involving a ‘utility 

token’ – but instead requires an assessment of ‘the economic realities underlying a 

transaction.’”27 

In addition, the CFTC has publicly taken the position that certain blockchain assets 

and cryptocurrencies are commodities.  The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family plans to 

negotiate Lydian tokens with retail customers in spot transactions (and will not 

transact Lydian token futures, options, swaps or other derivatives through their 

platform), not provide advice to potential purchasers regarding transactions in 

Lydian tokens themselves (such that it would be deemed an unregistered 

Commodity Trading Advisor under United States law), not accepts funds for the 

purpose of selling commodity interests in the Lydian tokens (such that it would be 

deemed a Commodity Pool Operator under United States law), and not conduct 

any leveraged, margined or financed “retail commodity transactions” in connection 

with the Lydian tokens (such that the indicated transactions would fall within the 

CFTC’s regulatory jurisdiction); nevertheless, given the considerable regulatory 

uncertainty surrounding CFTC regulation of this space, there can be no assurance 

                                                 

26 See In the Matter of Munchee Inc., Adm. Proc. File No. 3-18304 (Dec. 11, 2017), available 

at https://www.sec.gov/litigation/admin/2017/33-10445.pdf.   

27 See id. at ¶ 35 (internal citations omitted).   

https://www.sec.gov/litigation/admin/2017/33-10445.pdf


  

 
37 

to purchasers that LydianCoin SG and other members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family do not fall under CFTC scrutiny or regulation. 

To the extent that a domestic government or quasi-governmental agency exerts 

regulatory authority over a blockchain network or cryptocurrency asset, including 

but not limited to the ways set forth in this Whitepaper, the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family and the ability of purchasers to negotiate Lydian tokens may be materially 

and adversely affected. 

The effort to develop code for the purposes of facilitating the creation of 

certain of the programs and platforms set forth herein may be an area in 

which the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family has limited experience, may be 

expensive, and subject to the resolution of significant technical constraints. 

The DaVinci 11 Corporate Family is working to develop code for the purposes of 

facilitating the creation of certain of the programs and platforms set forth herein.  

Although the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family has hired and will hire employees with 

significant experience in the technical workings of blockchain, Ethereum and other 

cryptocurrencies, the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family does not have significant 

experience with such types of projects.  These projects may be expensive, and are 

subject to substantial risk that they may ultimately be unsuccessful.  Further, the 

creation thereof would be subject to the future resolution of numerous significant 

technical challenges which may be insurmountable. 

This issuance of Lydian tokens may constitute the issuance of a “Security” 

under U.S. Federal laws and regulations or those of other jurisdictions. 

Due to the nature of Lydian tokens described herein, LydianCoin SG does not think 

Lydian tokens should be considered a “security” as that term is defined in the 

Securities Act or under the securities law of any other jurisdiction. 

On July 25, 2017, the United States Securities and Exchange Commission (the 

“Commission”) issued a Report of Investigation under Section 21(a) of the 

Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the “Exchange Act”) describing an SEC 

investigation of The DAO, a virtual organization, and its use of distributed ledger or 

blockchain technology to facilitate the offer and sale of DAO Tokens to raise 

capital.  The Commission applied existing U.S. federal securities laws to this new 

paradigm, determining that DAO Tokens were securities.  The Commission 

stressed that those who offer and sell securities in the U.S. are required to comply 



  

 
38 

with federal securities laws, regardless of whether those securities are purchased 

with virtual currencies or distributed with blockchain technology.  The Commission’s 

announcement, and the related Report, may be found here:  

https://www.sec.gov/news/press-release/2017-131.28 

After reviewing the Report, LydianCoin SG believes that the Lydian token is 

substantially different from DAO Tokens, and should not be considered a “security” 

under U.S. federal securities laws.  Nevertheless, as noted by the Commission, the 

issuance of tokens represents a new paradigm and the application of the federal 

securities laws to this new paradigm is very fact specific.  If the Lydian tokens were 

deemed to be a security under U.S. federal securities laws then LydianCoin SG will 

be required to register such issuance under the Securities Act absent an available 

exemption and/or may be subject to civil and/or criminal investigations, proceedings 

and penalties, any of which might have a material adverse effect on LydianCoin 

SG, other members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family and purchasers’ ability to 

negotiate Lydian tokens.  The registration of Lydian tokens under the Securities Act 

would result in significant delay in the issuance of Lydian tokens and would require 

LydianCoin SG to incur substantial additional expense. 

In addition to United States securities laws, Lydian tokens may be deemed to be 

securities by other jurisdictions’ securities and exchange commissions or monetary 

authorities under applicable securities, banking or monetary laws and regulations, 

and might be similarly subject to registration requirements and/or civil and criminal 

investigations, proceedings and penalties, any of which might have a material 

adverse effect on LydianCoin SG, other members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family and purchasers’ ability to negotiate Lydian tokens, including but not limited 

to these recent events: 

                                                 

28 See also, e.g., (i) Christoph Jentzsch, The History of the DAO and Lessons Learned, 

Slock.It Blog (Aug. 24, 2016), https://blog.slock.it/the-history-of-the-dao-and-lessons-learned-

d06740f8cfa5#.5o62zo8uv; (ii) Christoph Jentzsch, Decentralized Autonomous Organization 

to Automate Governance Final Draft – Under Review, 

https://download.slock.it/public/DAO/WhitePaper.pdf; and (iii) See Securities and Exchange 

Commission, Release No. 81207, Report of Investigation Pursuant to Section 21(a) of the 

Securities Exchange Act of 1934:  The DAO (July 25, 2017), 

https://www.sec.gov/litigation/investreport/34-81207.pdf. 



  

 
39 

The People’s Republic of China has banned initial coin 

offerings in China: 

The People’s Bank of China announced on September 4, 2017, that initial coin 

offerings are banned inside the People’s Republic of China and that refunds would 

be sought with respect to prior offerings.29  Digital token financing and trading 

platforms are prohibited from converting digital tokens to fiat currencies.  As of 

November 1, 2017, cryptocurrency exchanges were no longer operating in the 

People’s Republic of China.30  There is no certainty regarding how long this ban will 

be in effect or whether it will extend to secondary trading of digital tokens.   

This issuance of Lydian tokens may constitute the issuance of 

a “Security” under the Laws of Hong Kong and trading of 

Lydian tokens on secondary markets may be subject to 

applicable regulatory requirements: 

On September 5, 2017, the Hong Kong Securities and Futures Commission (the 

“SFC”) issued a statement advising that “depending on the facts and circumstances 

of an ICO, digital tokens that are offered or sold may be “securities” … and subject 

to the securities laws of Hong Kong.”31 (emphasis in original).  The SFC further 

noted that “Parties engaging in the secondary trading of such tokens (eg, on 

cryptocurrency exchanges) may also be subject to the SFC’s licensing and conduct 

requirements.”32   

Regulation of cryptocurrencies such as Lydian tokens is likely 

to change in Korea in the near term and may become stricter: 

On September 3, 2017, Korea’s Financial Supervisory Commission held a joint task 

force with digital currency-related regulators and other bodies, including the Korea 

                                                 

29 See L. Chen and J. Lee, “Bitcoin Tumbles as PBOC Declares Initial Coin Offerings Illegal” 
Bloomberg.com (Sept. 4, 2017), available at https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2017-
09-04/china-central-bank-says-initial-coin-offerings-are-illegal. 

30 See K. Rapoza, “Cryptocurrency Exchanges Officially Dead In China” Forbes.com (Nov. 2, 
2017), available at https://www.forbes.com/sites/kenrapoza/2017/11/02/cryptocurrency-
exchanges-officially-dead-in-china/#3d38d89f2a83.   

31 Sec. and Futures Comm’n., Statement on initial coin offerings (Sept. 5, 2017), available at 
http://www.sfc.hk/edistributionWeb/gateway/EN/news-and-
announcements/news/doc?refNo=17PR117. 

32 Id.   

https://www.forbes.com/sites/kenrapoza/2017/11/02/cryptocurrency-exchanges-officially-dead-in-china/#3d38d89f2a83
https://www.forbes.com/sites/kenrapoza/2017/11/02/cryptocurrency-exchanges-officially-dead-in-china/#3d38d89f2a83


  

 
40 

Fair Trade Commission and the National Tax Service.33  Authorities intend to 

strengthen user authentication procedures, regulate domestic trading of digital 

currencies, increase consumer protections, and punish initial coin offerings that do 

not comply with Korean laws.34   

Secondary trading of Lydian tokens may be deemed subject to 

regulatory restrictions or even illegal by regulators 

subsequent to the publication of this Whitepaper: 

Other countries or regulatory jurisdictions may follow Hong Kong and deem the 

secondary trading of digital tokens potentially subject to regulatory requirements of 

local securities enforcement and regulatory bodies.  It is possible some jurisdictions 

may ban secondary trading altogether.  Laws and regulations applicable to digital 

tokens are evolving and there can be no certainty as to what any country, 

regulatory body, or other rule-making agency may determine.  The effect of any 

future regulatory change is impossible to predict, but such change could be 

substantial and adverse to our business.  Developments in U.S. and foreign 

commercial and corporate laws may alter the nature of our business or the 

operation of a blockchain network upon which we rely in a manner that adversely 

affects our business.   

Blockchain networks face an uncertain regulatory landscape in many other 

jurisdictions such as the European Union, China and Russia.  Various foreign 

jurisdictions may, in the near future, adopt laws, regulations or directives that 

materially adversely affect or otherwise severely impact the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family.  Such laws, regulations or directives may conflict with those of the United 

States or may directly and negatively impact its business.  The effect of any future 

regulatory change is impossible to predict, but such change could be substantial 

and materially adverse to the development and growth of the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family and the adoption, utility and transferability of the Lydian tokens. 

                                                 

33 See Yoon Yung Sil, Regulating Bitcoin Trading Financial Authorities to Strengthen 
Regulations on Digital Currency Trading, BusinessKorea.co.kr (Sept. 4, 2017), available at 
http://www.businesskorea.co.kr/english/news/money/19180-regulating-bitcoin-trading-
financial-authorities-strengthen-regulations-digital. 

34 See id.   



  

 
41 

Purchasers of Lydian tokens will have no voting rights, consent rights or 

other control over the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family. 

Purchasers are not and will not be entitled, to vote or receive dividends or be 

deemed the holder of capital stock of LydianCoin SG or any other member of the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family for any purpose, nor will anything be construed to 

confer on the purchasers any of the rights of a stockholder of LydianCoin SG or any 

other member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family or any right to vote for the 

election of directors or upon any matter submitted to stockholders at any meeting 

thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action or to receive notice of 

meetings, or to receive subscription rights or otherwise. 

Lydian tokens may be subject to unclaimed property or escheat laws 

governing prepaid or future performance contracts in the United States or 

other jurisdictions. 

Each state, the District of Columbia, and some territories of the United States has 

an unclaimed property (or “escheat” or “abandoned property”) law which might 

apply to the Lydian tokens.  Such unclaimed property laws, if applied to Lydian 

tokens, would provide that if the value of the services set forth herein has not been 

claimed by the owner of a particular Lydian token after a specified period of time 

(typically three to five years after issuance), then LydianCoin SG might be required 

to report and remit (i.e., to “escheat”) such unclaimed amounts to the state, the 

District of Columbia, or the territory, if any, that has the right to apply its unclaimed 

property laws thereto.  While no United States domiciled member of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family issues Lydian tokens or provides services in return thereof, to the 

extent a United States state, the District of Columbia, or territory requires escheat 

with respect to unutilized Lydian tokens, LydianCoin SG would be required to remit 

funds from the sale of Lydian tokens thereto and would be authorized by law to 

decline to transact with respect to such Lydian tokens when presented by 

purchasers.  Purchasers of such Lydian tokens would then be required under such 

state’s or territory’s law to reclaim funds from such state or territory.  Lydian tokens 

may be subject to similar unclaimed property or escheat laws under other 

jurisdictions.   



  

 
42 

Purchasers may lack information and/or access for monitoring LydianCoin 

SG and the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family. 

A purchaser of Lydian tokens may not be able to obtain all information it would 

want regarding LydianCoin SG or any other member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family or the Lydian tokens themselves on a timely basis or, as the case may be, 

in substantial part or at all.  It is possible that purchasers may not be aware on a 

timely basis or at all of material adverse changes that have occurred with respect to 

any of LydianCoin SG or any other member of DaVinci 11 or with respect to the 

Lydian tokens. 

Lydian tokens have no operating history. 

Lydian tokens will be a newly formed token and have no operating history.  Past 

performance of tokens or coins issued by any other person or entity, including 

without limitation Bitcoin or Ethereum, is not predictive of the value of the Lydian 

tokens in the future. 

The further development and acceptance of blockchain networks, which are 

part of a new and rapidly changing industry, are subject to a variety of factors 

that are difficult to evaluate.  The slowing or stopping of the development or 

acceptance of blockchain networks and blockchain assets would have a 

material adverse effect on the successful development and adoption of the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family’s platforms and proposed projects, as well as 

the Lydian tokens themselves. 

The growth of the blockchain industry in general, as well as the blockchain 

networks with which the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family will rely and interact, is 

subject to a high degree of uncertainty.  The factors affecting the further 

development of the cryptocurrency industry, as well as blockchain networks 

include, without limitation: 

Worldwide growth in the adoption and use of Bitcoin, Ethereum and other 

blockchain technologies; 



  

 
43 

Government and quasi-government regulation of cryptocurrency and other 

blockchain assets and their use and exchangeability, or restrictions on or regulation 

of access to and operation of blockchain networks or similar systems; 

The maintenance and development of the open-source software protocol of the 

Bitcoin networks; 

Changes in consumer demographics and public tastes and preferences; 

The availability and popularity of other forms or methods of buying and selling 

goods and services, or trading assets including new means of using fiat currencies 

or existing networks; 

The nature and extent of cyberattacks, protocol forks and cryptocurrency co-

participant fraud; 

General economic conditions and the regulatory environment relating to 

cryptocurrencies; and 

A decline in the popularity or acceptance of Bitcoin, Ethereum or other blockchain-

based tokens and coins would adversely affect its results of operations. 

The slowing or stopping of the development, general acceptance and adoption and 

usage of blockchain networks and blockchain assets may deter or delay the 

acceptance and adoption of the Lydian tokens. 

Risk of losing access to Lydian tokens due to loss of private key(s), custodial 

error or purchaser error. 

A private key, or a combination of private keys, may be deemed a necessary 

element to control and, negotiate Lydian tokens stored in your digital wallet or vault.  

Accordingly, loss of requisite private key(s) associated with your digital wallet or 

vault storing Lydian tokens will result in loss of such Lydian tokens.  Moreover, any 

third party that gains access to such private key(s), including by gaining access to 

login credentials of a digital wallet or vault service you use, may be able to 

misappropriate your Lydian tokens.  Any errors or malfunctions caused by or 

otherwise related to the digital wallet or vault you choose to receive and store 

Lydian tokens, including your own failure to properly maintain or use such digital 

wallet or vault, may also result in the loss of your Lydian tokens.  Additionally, your 

failure to follow precisely the procedures specifically set forth for buying and 



  

 
44 

receiving, or negotiating Lydian tokens, including, for instance, providing the wrong 

address for receiving Lydian tokens, may result in the loss of your Lydian tokens. 

Risks associated with the Ethereum protocol. 

Because Lydian tokens and are based on the Ethereum protocol, any malfunction, 

breakdown, abandonment or facts of the Ethereum protocol or other issues 

involving the related Ethereum infrastructure, wallet design, implementation factors, 

internet failures, malware, spoofing, phishing, spear phishing, poor software design, 

use of pre-released or unproven, non-reviewed software or malicious co-participant 

actions may have a material adverse effect on the Lydian tokens.  Moreover, 

advances in cryptography, or technical advances such as the development of 

quantum computing, could present risks to Lydian tokens including the utility of 

Lydian tokens for obtaining services, by rendering ineffective the cryptographic 

consensus mechanism that underpins the Ethereum protocol. 

Risk of mining attacks. 

As with other decentralized cryptographic tokens based on the Ethereum protocol, 

Lydian tokens are susceptible to attacks by miners in the course of validating 

Lydian tokens transactions on the Ethereum blockchain, including, but not limited, 

to double-spend attacks, majority mining power attacks, and selfish-mining attacks.  

Any successful attacks present a risk to the Lydian tokens, including, but not limited 

to, accurate execution and recording of transactions involving Lydian tokens. 

Risk of hacking and security weaknesses. 

Hackers or other malicious groups or organizations may attempt to interfere with 

the Lydian tokens in a variety of ways, including, but not limited to, malware 

attacks, denial of service attacks, consensus-based attacks, Sybil attacks, smurfing 

and spoofing.  Furthermore, because the Lydian tokens are based on open-source 

software, there is a risk that a third party or a member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate 

Family team may intentionally or unintentionally introduce weaknesses into the core 

infrastructure of the Lydian tokens, which could negatively affect the Lydian tokens, 

including Lydian tokens’ utility for obtaining services. 

 



  

 
45 

The Lydian tokens and any related blockchain platforms, as well as the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family’s existing cloud suite and online platforms, may be the target of 

malicious cyberattacks or may contain exploitable flaws in its underlying code (such 

as distributed denial of service attacks, double-spend attacks, 51% attacks, or other 

malicious attacks), which may result in security breaches and the loss or theft of 

Lydian tokens.  If cybersecurity is compromised or if the Lydian tokens and related 

platforms are subjected to attacks that frustrate or thwart its customers’ ability to 

access or use their tokens, the purchasers of Lydian tokens may suffer losses in 

value or otherwise be materially adversely affected. 

On February 7, 2014, MtGox (a bitcoin exchange based in Japan) halted all bitcoin 

transactions and withdrawals due to the disappearance of hundreds of thousands 

of customer- and MtGox-owned bitcoins.35  All trading was suspended two weeks 

later following an internal investigation that pegged the loss at 744,408 bitcoins.36  

According to Mark Karpeles, CEO of MtGox, MtGox was susceptible to theft 

because of a “defect or ‘bug’ in the bitcoin software algorithm, which was exploited 

by one or more persons who had ‘hacked’ the bitcoin network.”37  Ultimately, 

customer losses totaled nearly 750,000 bitcoins, while MtGox losses were 

approximately 100,000 bitcoins.  At the time, this represented approximately $473 

million and nearly 7% of the bitcoins then in existence.38  MtGox filed for bankruptcy 

protection in Japan on February 28, 2014.  Following a proposed class action suit 

by traders alleging fraud against MtGox, the company sought recognition of the 

Japanese proceeding in U.S. bankruptcy court on March 9, 2014.39  The Japanese 

proceeding converted to liquidation in April 2014. 

Another substantial theft of crypto-currency funds occurred in 2016 in connection 

with the ICO of The DAO, an unincorporated organization that was intended as a 

first generation “Decentralized Autonomous Organization.”  In exchange for ETH, 

participants received DAO Tokens, representing ownership interests and voting 

rights in The DAO.  The holders of DAO Tokens stood to share in the anticipated 

earnings from these projects as a return on their investment in DAO Tokens by re-

                                                 

35 See Declaration of Robert Marie Mark Karpeles, In re MtGox Co., Ltd. (a/k/a MtGox KK), 
No. 14-31229 (Bankr. N.D. Tex. Mar. 3, 2014) [Docket No. 3], at 4. 

36 See id. 

37 Id. 

38 See id., at 5. 

39 See Tom Hals, “Mt. Gox Files U.S. Bankruptcy, Opponents Call It a Ruse,” Reuters.Com, 
March 10, 2014, available at https://www.reuters.com/article/us-bitcoin-mtgox-bankruptcy-
idUSBREA290WU20140310. 



  

 
46 

selling the tokens on a number of different web-based platforms that supported 

secondary trading in the DAO Tokens.  DAO founders envisioned projects and 

earnings distributions would be voted upon by all DAO Token holders, and that 

project proposals would be embodied in Ethereum blockchain contracts.  DAO 

Token holders could exercise their voting rights by choosing to distribute earnings 

from prior projects back to DAO Token holders, or to reinvest those earnings on 

new project proposals submitted for voting.   

Approximately 1.15 billion DAO Tokens were sold for approximately 12 million ETH 

from April 30, 2016, to May 28, 2016.  Approximately $150 million USD was raised 

in the offering.    

On June 17, 2016, after the offering period ended, an unknown party exploited a 

software security vulnerability in The DAO and diverted 3.6 million ETH (worth 

approximately $45 million, and representing one third of the ETH raised by The 

DAO offering).  In response, Slock.it’s cofounders (associated with the founding of 

The DAO) proposed a “Hard Fork” protocol (a process whereby the path of the 

blockchain is split, invalidating transactions confirmed by the nodes that have not 

been upgraded to the new version of the protocol software) to the Ethereum 

blockchain to restore DAO Token holders’ investments.  On July 20, 2016, following 

implementation of the “Hard Fork” protocol updates, all funds raised in the offering, 

including those stolen, were transferred to a recovery address, where DAO Token 

holders could exchange their DAO Tokens for ETH. 

Other initial coin offerings have been compromised by attacks.  On July 17, 2017, 

$7 million in ETH was stolen from investors trying to participate in social-trading 

startup CoinDash’s initial coin offering.40  Later that week, a well-known Ethereum 

wallet was recently hacked as well:  on July 19, 2017, approximately 153,000 ether 

tokens worth roughly $32 million were stolen by hackers exploiting security 

vulnerabilities in Parity’s digital wallet.41 

                                                 

40 See Alexandria Arnold, “CoinDash Says Hacker Stole $7 Million at Initial Coin Offering,” 
Bloomberg.com, July 17, 2017, available at https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2017-
07-17/coindash-says-hacker-stole-7-million-at-initial-coin-offering. 

41 See Luke Graham, “$32 Million Worth of Digital Currency Ether Stolen by Hackers,” 
CNBC.com, July 20, 2017, available at https://www.cnbc.com/2017/07/20/32-million-worth-
of-digital-currency-ether-stolen-by-hackers.html. 



  

 
47 

Risks associated with markets for and valuation of Lydian tokens. 

Lydian tokens are intended to be used solely as set forth in this Whitepaper and the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family will not support or otherwise facilitate any secondary 

trading or external valuation of Lydian tokens.  This could therefore create illiquidity 

risk with respect to Lydian tokens you hold.  Even if secondary trading of Lydian 

tokens is facilitated by third party exchanges, such exchanges may be relatively 

new and subject to little or no regulatory oversight, making them more susceptible 

to market-related risks.   

Furthermore, to the extent that third-parties do ascribe an external exchange value 

to Lydian tokens (e.g., as denominated in a digital or fiat currency), such value may 

increase or decrease from time to time based on the business model of the DaVinci 

11 Corporate Family, the supply and demand of Lydian tokens on the market and 

various other market forces, and even be extremely volatile and/or diminish to zero.  

For instance, if the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family initially offers programmatic 

audience targeting for crypto-audiences at a $5 cost per thousand advertisement 

impressions, which is held in reserve at LydianCoin, nonetheless in a low-supply or 

high-price environment in ad exchanges and private marketplaces, the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family may incur costs higher than such reserved $5 amount; 

conversely, in a high-supply or low-price environment will have costs lower than 

such reserved $5 amount and due to the real-time purchase/delivery nature of ad 

exchanges prevents the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family or other purchasers from 

buying during a low-cost period and storing.  In either case, the effect of such 

market forces may increase or decrease the related external valuation of Lydian 

tokens. 

In issuing Lydian tokens, LydianCoin SG intends that Lydian tokens be purchased 

and held by parties that utilize the DaVinci 11 suite of services.  

From time to time, LydianCoin SG may issue further Lydian tokens into the market 

(including with respect to Lots or through crowdsales subsequent to the date of this 

Whitepaper or from its supply of reserve tokens).  Such additional sales could 

include terms more or less attractive than those set forth herein and/or result in 

significant dilution of the value of purchasers' Lydian tokens and a concomitant 

price decline with respect thereto.    



  

 
48 

Risk of uninsured losses. 

Unlike bank accounts or accounts at some other financial institutions, Lydian 

tokens are uninsured unless the purchaser is able to specifically obtain private 

insurance to insure them.  Thus, in the event of loss or loss of utility value, there is 

no public insurer, such as the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or private 

insurance arranged by us, to offer recourse to you. 

 

Risks arising from taxation. 

The tax characterization of Lydian tokens is uncertain.  You must seek your own 

tax advice in connection with purchasing Lydian tokens, which may result in 

adverse tax consequences to you, including withholding taxes, income taxes and 

tax reporting requirements. 

  



 

    

49 

SCHEDULE A 

Important Notices, Disclaimers and Legends 

The Whitepaper has been prepared solely in respect of LydianCoin SG’s proposed 

sale of Lydian tokens.  No Lydian tokens are being offered for subscription or sale 

in any jurisdiction pursuant to this Whitepaper.  This Whitepaper is being made 

available for information purposes only.  This Whitepaper does not constitute a 

prospectus or offer document of any sort, and is not intended to constitute an offer, 

solicitation, recommendation or invitation to any person to subscribe for or 

purchase tokens or any rights or securities of any form in LydianCoin SG, units in a 

business trust, units in a collective investment scheme or any other form of 

investment, or a solicitation for any form of investment in any jurisdiction.  Lydian 

tokens are not presently offered to any person and shall not be registered for sale 

under the securities laws and regulations of any country or any state, territory, 

department or municipality thereof, and are not intended to constitute securities of 

any form, units in a business trust, units in a collective investment scheme or any 

other form of investment in any jurisdiction. 

This Whitepaper has been prepared solely for information purposes to be delivered 

to prospective purchasers of Lydian tokens to be issued by LydianCoin SG.  The 

recipient agrees that any reproduction or distribution of this Whitepaper, in whole or 

in part, or the disclosure of its contents, without the prior written consent of the 

LydianCoin SG, is strictly prohibited.  LydianCoin SG reserves the right to modify 

the terms of the tokens described in this Whitepaper, and the tokens are offered 

subject to LydianCoin SG’s ability to reject any offer to purchase Lydian tokens in 

whole or in part. 

Certain statements in this Whitepaper constitute forward-looking statements.  When 

used in this Whitepaper, the words “may,” “will,” “should,” “project,” “anticipate,” 

“believe,” “estimate,” “intend,” “expect,” “continue,” “target”, “believe”, “if”, “aim”, 

“plan”, “possible”, “probable”, “should”, “would” and similar expressions or the 

negatives thereof are generally intended to identify forward-looking statements.  

Such forward-looking statements, including the intended actions and performance 



 

    

50 

objectives of LydianCoin SG, involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and 

other important factors that could cause the actual results, performance, 

achievements or development of LydianCoin SG or other members of the DaVinci 

11 Corporate Family to differ materially from any future results, performance or 

achievements expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements.  These 

factors include, amongst others: 

(a) changes in political, social, economic and stock or cryptocurrency 

market conditions, and the regulatory environment in the countries 

in which LydianCoin SG or other members of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family conduct their respective businesses and 

operations; 

(b) the risk that LydianCoin SG or other members of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family may be unable to execute or implement their 

respective business strategies and future plans; 

(c) changes in interest rates and exchange rates of fiat currencies and 

cryptocurrencies; 

(d) changes in the anticipated growth strategies and expected internal 

growth of LydianCoin SG or other members of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family; 

(e) changes in the availability and fees payable to LydianCoin SG or 

other members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family in connection 

with their respective businesses and operations; 

(f) changes in the availability and salaries of employees who are 

required by LydianCoin SG or other members of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family to operate their respective businesses and 

operations; 

(g) changes in preferences of customers of the respective businesses 

and operations of LydianCoin SG or other members of the DaVinci 

11 Corporate Family; 



 

    

51 

(h) changes in competitive conditions under which LydianCoin SG or 

other members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family operate, and 

the ability of LydianCoin SG or other members of the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family to compete under such conditions; 

(i) changes in the future capital needs of LydianCoin SG or other 

members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family and the availability of 

financing and capital to fund such needs; 

(j) war or acts of international or domestic terrorism; 

(k) occurrences of catastrophic events, natural disasters and acts of 

God that affect the businesses and/or operations of LydianCoin SG 

or other members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family; 

(l) the occurrence of any bankruptcy, insolvency and reorganization or 

similar proceedings under the laws of any applicable jurisdiction 

with respect to LydianCoin SG or any of the other members of the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family; 

(m) other factors beyond the control of LydianCoin SG or other 

members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family; and 

(n) any risk and uncertainties associated with LydianCoin SG or other 

members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family and their respective 

businesses and operations, Lydian tokens and/or the Lydian token 

sale. 

All forward-looking statements made by or attributable to LydianCoin SG or other 

members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family or persons acting on behalf of them 

are expressly qualified in their entirety by such factors.  No representation or 

warranty is made as to future performance or such forward-looking statements.  All 

forward-looking statements in this Whitepaper speak only as of the date hereof.  

LydianCoin SG and all other members of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family 

expressly disclaim any obligation or undertaking to disseminate any updates or 

revisions to any forward-looking statement contained herein to reflect any change 



 

    

52 

in its expectation with regard thereto or any change in events, conditions, or 

circumstances on which any such statement is based.  Prospective purchasers are 

not to construe this Whitepaper as investment, legal, tax, regulatory, financial, 

accounting or other advice, and this Whitepaper is not intended to provide the sole 

basis for any evaluation of an investment in an interest.  Prior to acquiring an 

interest, a prospective purchaser should consult with its own legal, investment, tax, 

accounting and other advisors to determine the potential benefits, burdens, and 

other consequences of such investment.  The information and opinions contained 

in this Whitepaper are provided as at the date of this Whitepaper and are subject to 

change without notice. 

This Whitepaper includes information obtained from various third party sources 

(“Third Party Information”).  None of the publishers of the Third Party Information 

has consented to the inclusion of the Third Party Information in this Whitepaper and 

is therefore not liable for the Third Party Information.  While LydianCoin SG has 

taken reasonable action to ensure that the Third Party Information have been 

included in their proper form and context, neither LydianCoin SG, nor its directors, 

executive officers and employees acting on its behalf, has independently verified 

the accuracy, reliability, completeness of the contents, or ascertained any 

applicable underlying assumption, of the relevant Third Party Information.  

Consequently, neither LydianCoin SG nor its directors, executive officers and 

employees acting on their behalf makes any representation or warranty as to the 

accuracy, reliability or completeness of such information and shall not be obliged to 

provide any updates on the same. 

To facilitate a better understanding of the Lydian tokens being offered for purchase 

by LydianCoin SG, and the businesses and operations of LydianCoin SG, certain 

technical terms and abbreviations, as well as, in certain instances, their 

descriptions, have been used in this Whitepaper.  These descriptions and assigned 

meanings should not be treated as being definitive of their meanings and may not 

correspond to standard industry meanings or usage. 

Words importing the singular shall, where applicable, include the plural and vice 

versa and words importing the masculine gender shall, where applicable, include 



 

    

53 

the feminine and neuter genders and vice versa.  References to persons shall 

include corporations.  References to “$” shall mean U.S. Dollars, unless otherwise 

indicated. 

No person has been or is authorised to give any information or representation not 

contained in this Whitepaper in connection with LydianCoin SG and its businesses 

and operations, Lydian tokens, or the Lydian token sale and, if given, such 

information or representation must not be relied upon as having been authorised by 

or on behalf of LydianCoin SG.  The Lydian token sale shall not, under any 

circumstances, constitute a continuing representation or create any suggestion or 

implication that there has been no change or development reasonably likely to 

involve a material change in the affairs, conditions and prospects of LydianCoin SG 

or in any statement of fact or information contained in this Whitepaper since the 

date hereof. 

This Whitepaper, in its current form (including, with its watermark), is being 

circulated by LydianCoin SG in order to invite feedback on the Lydian token, and is 

subject to review and revision in all regards and at any time and from time to time 

by the Board of Directors, the Board of Advisers and/or legal advisers of 

LydianCoin SG.  No part of this Whitepaper is intended to create legal relations 

between a recipient of this Whitepaper or to be legally binding or enforceable by 

such recipient against LydianCoin SG.  An updated version of this Whitepaper may 

be published on a date to be determined and announced by LydianCoin SG in due 

course.  No person is bound to enter into any contract or binding legal commitment 

in relation to the sale and purchase of Lydian tokens and no cryptocurrency or 

other form of payment is to be accepted on the basis of this Whitepaper.  Any 

agreement as between LydianCoin SG and you as a purchaser and in relation to 

any sale and purchase, of Lydian is to be governed by only a separate document 

setting out the terms and conditions (the “T&Cs”) of such agreement.  In the event 

of any inconsistencies between the T&Cs and this Whitepaper, the former shall 

prevail. 

Lydian tokens have not been and will not be registered under the United States 

Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “Securities Act”), or any other United 



 

    

54 

States federal or state securities laws or the securities laws and regulations of any 

foreign jurisdiction (including the Securities and Futures Act (Chapter 289) of 

Singapore) (“SFA”).  LydianCoin SG believes that the Lydian tokens should not be 

considered to be “securities” under the Securities Act.  Nevertheless, to the extent 

offered within the United States, the Lydian tokens will be offered and sold (i)(a) to 

“accredited investors” in a manner substantially similar to the exemption provided 

by Section 4(a)(2) of the Securities Act and Regulation D promulgated thereunder, 

or (b) to non-U.S. Persons in transactions outside the United States who are not 

purchasing for the account or benefit of a U.S. Person as defined under 

Regulation S under the Securities Act, and (ii) other exemptions of similar import in 

the laws of the states and other jurisdictions where the proposed sale will be made.  

In addition, LydianCoin SG will not be registered as an investment company under 

the United States Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the “Investment 

Company Act”), or the investment company laws and regulations of any foreign 

jurisdiction.  Consequently, purchasers will not be afforded the protections of the 

Securities Act, the Investment Company Act or any similar laws, rules and 

regulations of any other jurisdiction in which the Lydian tokens are offered or sold. 

Purchasers should be aware that they will be required to bear the financial risks of 

the purchase of Lydian tokens for an indefinite period of time.  Purchasers of 

Lydian tokens should be aware that they bear any risks involved in the purchase of 

such tokens, if any, for an indefinite period of time. 

The purchase of Lydian tokens involves a high degree of risk, volatility and 

illiquidity.  A prospective purchaser should thoroughly review the information 

contained herein and carefully consider whether a purchase of Lydian tokens is 

suitable to the purchaser’s financial situation. 

No person has been authorized to make any statement concerning LydianCoin SG 

or the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family or the sale of the Lydian tokens discussed 

herein other than as set forth in this Whitepaper, and any such statements, if made, 

must not be relied upon. 

Purchasers should make their own investigations and evaluations of the Lydian 

tokens that will be delivered pursuant thereto, including the merits and risks 



 

    

55 

involved in a purchase of Lydian tokens.  Prior to any purchase, LydianCoin SG will 

give purchasers the opportunity to ask questions of and receive answers and 

additional information from it concerning the terms and conditions of this proposed 

sale and other relevant matters to the extent LydianCoin SG possesses the same 

or can acquire it without unreasonable effort or expense.  Purchasers should inform 

themselves as to the legal requirements applicable to them in respect of the 

acquisition, holding and negotiating Lydian tokens upon their delivery, and as to the 

income and other tax consequences to them of such acquisition, holding and 

negotiating. 

This Whitepaper does not constitute an offer to sell, or a solicitation of an offer to 

buy, a Lydian token in any jurisdiction in which it is unlawful to make such an offer 

or solicitation.  No securities regulatory authority in any jurisdiction has approved or 

disapproved purchasing Lydian tokens.  Furthermore, the no securities regulatory 

authorities have confirmed the accuracy or determined the adequacy of this 

Whitepaper, nor is it intended that any securities regulatory authorities will do so.  

The publication, distribution or dissemination of this Whitepaper does not imply that 

the applicable laws, regulatory requirements or rules have been complied with.  

Any representation to the contrary may be a criminal offense. 

This Whitepaper does not constitute or form part of any opinion on any advice to 

sell, or any solicitation of any offer by the LydianCoin SG or the DaVinci 11 

Corporate Family to purchase any Lydian tokens, nor shall it or any part of it nor the 

fact of its presentation form the basis of, or be relied upon in connection with, any 

contract or investment decision. 

Purchasers may tender Bitcoin, Ether or other cryptocurrencies identified and 

authorized by LydianCoin SG from time to time in exchange for the Lydian tokens.  

Such currencies, cryptocurrencies and other digital assets are subject to 

fluctuations in the rate of exchange and, in the case of digital assets, the exchange 

valuations.  Such fluctuations may have an adverse effect on the value or price of 

Lydian tokens. 

Every purchaser shall represent, warrant and covenant that it is responsible for 

acting in accordance with and to the extent permitted by the laws of his or her 



 

    

56 

respective jurisdiction.  This is not an offering in any jurisdiction where it is unlawful 

to do so, and each purchaser shall represent, warrant and covenant that it is 

responsible to not participate if that is the case. 

Although LydianCoin SG does not consider Lydian tokens to be “securities” 

under the laws of any jurisdiction, purchasers of Lydian tokens should take 

note of the laws of their respective home jurisdictions when considering a 

purchase or resale thereof, that no securities and exchange commission, 

bank or monetary authority or other governmental agency of any country has 

passed on or approved the proposed sale of Lydian tokens (including but not 

limited to any of the following countries), and failure so to register may have 

an effect on the purchaser’s ability to purchase and resell the Lydian tokens.   

Restrictions on Distribution 

The distribution of this Whitepaper and the proposed sale of Lydian tokens in 

certain jurisdictions may be restricted and accordingly persons into whose 

possession this Whitepaper may come are required by LydianCoin SG to inform 

themselves of and to observe any such restrictions.  This Whitepaper, any part 

thereof and any copy thereof must not be taken or transmitted to any country where 

distribution or dissemination of this Whitepaper, or the proposed sale of Lydian 

Tokens, is prohibited or restricted. 

This Whitepaper does not constitute a solicitation to any person in any jurisdiction 

in which such solicitation is not authorized or to any person to whom it would be 

unlawful to make such solicitation.  The foregoing information is for general 

guidance only.  It is the responsibility of any person or persons in possession of this 

Whitepaper and wishing to participate in the proposed sale of Lydian tokens to 

inform themselves of, and to observe, all applicable laws and regulations of any 

relevant jurisdiction.  Prospective participants should inform themselves as to legal 

requirements also applying and any applicable exchange control regulations and 

applicable taxes in the countries of their respective citizenship, residence or 

domicile. 



 

    

57 

Restrictions on Distribution in Singapore 

By accessing and/or accepting possession of any information in this Whitepaper or 

such part thereof (as the case may be) in Singapore, you: 

(a) represent and warrant that you are either an institutional investor42 

as defined under Section 4A(1)(c) of the Securities and Futures Act 

(Chapter 289) of Singapore (the “SFA”), a relevant person43 as 

                                                 

42 “institutional investor” means — (i) a bank that is licensed under the Banking Act 

(Chapter 19) of Singapore; (ii) a merchant bank that is approved as a financial institution 

under section 28 of the Monetary Authority of Singapore Act (Chapter 186) of Singapore; 

(iii) a finance company that is licensed under the Finance Companies Act (Chapter 108) of 

Singapore; (iv) a company or co-operative society that is licensed under the Insurance Act 

(Chapter 142) of Singapore to carry on insurance business in Singapore; (v) a company 

licensed under the Trust Companies Act 2005 (Act 11 of 2005) of Singapore; (vi) the 

Government of Singapore; (vii) a statutory body established under any Act of Singapore; 

(viii) a pension fund or collective investment scheme; (ix) the holder of a capital markets 

services licence for — (A) dealing in securities; (B) fund management; (C) providing 

custodial services for securities; (CA) real estate investment trust management; 

(D) securities financing; or (E) trading in futures contracts; (x) a person (other than an 

individual) who carries on the business of dealing in bonds with accredited investors or 

expert investors; (xi) the trustee of such trust as the Monetary Authority of Singapore 

(“Authority”) may prescribe, when acting in that capacity; or (xii) such other person as the 

Authority may prescribe. 

   “accredited investor” means — (i) an individual — (A) whose net personal assets exceed in 

value S$2 million (or its equivalent in a foreign currency) or such other amount as the 

Authority may prescribe in place of the first amount; or (B) whose income in the preceding 

12 months is not less than $300,000 (or its equivalent in a foreign currency) or such other 

amount as the Authority may prescribe in place of the first amount; (ii) a corporation with net 

assets exceeding $10 million in value (or its equivalent in a foreign currency) or such other 

amount as the Authority may prescribe, in place of the first amount, as determined by — 

(A) the most recent audited balance-sheet of the corporation; or (B) where the corporation is 

not required to prepare audited accounts regularly, a balance-sheet of the corporation 

certified by the corporation as giving a true and fair view of the state of affairs of the 

corporation as of the date of the balance-sheet, which date shall be within the preceding 

12 months; (iii) the trustee of such trust as the Authority may prescribe, when acting in that 

capacity; or (iv) such other person as the Authority may prescribe; (b) “expert investor” 

means — (i) a person whose business involves the acquisition and disposal, or the holding, 

of capital markets products, whether as principal or agent; (ii) the trustee of such trust as the 

Authority may prescribe, when acting in that capacity; or (iii) such other person as the 

Authority may prescribe. 

43 “relevant person” means — (a) an accredited investor; (b) a corporation the sole business 

of which is to hold investments and the entire share capital of which is owned by one or more 



 

    

58 

defined under Section 275(2) of the SFA or persons to whom an 

offer is being made44 as referred to in Section 275(1A) of the SFA; 

and 

(b) agree to be bound by the limitations and restrictions described 

herein. 

Any failure to comply with these restrictions may constitute a violation of applicable 

securities laws in Singapore. 

NOTICE TO RESIDENTS OF THE PEOPLE’S REPUBLIC OF CHINA 

LYDIAN TOKENS MAY NOT BE OFFERED OR SOLD DIRECTLY OR 

INDIRECTLY IN THE PEOPLE’S REPUBLIC OF CHINA (WHICH, FOR SUCH 

PURPOSES, DOES NOT INCLUDE THE HONG KONG OR MACAU SPECIAL 

ADMINISTRATIVE REGIONS OR TAIWAN) (THE “PRC”).  THE INFORMATION 

                                                 

individuals, each of whom is an accredited investor; (c) a trustee of a trust the sole purpose 

of which is to hold investments and each beneficiary of which is an individual who is an 

accredited investor; (d) an officer or equivalent person of the person making the offer (such 

person being an entity) or a spouse, parent, brother, sister, son or daughter of that officer or 

equivalent person; or (e) a spouse, parent, brother, sister, son or daughter of the person 

making the offer (such person being an individual). 

44 The persons to whom an offer referred to in Section 275(1A) is to be made include a 

person who acquires the securities as principal, whether or not the securities have been 

previously issued, if — (a) the offer is on terms that the securities may only be acquired at a 

consideration of not less than $200,000 (or its equivalent in a foreign currency) for each 

transaction, whether such amount is to be paid for in cash or by exchange of securities or 

other assets; (b) the offer is not accompanied by an advertisement making an offer or calling 

attention to the offer or intended offer; (c) no selling or promotional expenses are paid or 

incurred in connection with the offer other than those incurred for administrative or 

professional services, or by way of commission or fee for services rendered by — (i) the 

holder of a capital markets services licence to deal in securities; (ii) an exempt person in 

respect of dealing in securities; or (iii) a person who is licensed, approved, authorised or 

otherwise regulated under the laws, codes or other requirements of any foreign jurisdiction in 

respect of dealing in securities, or who is exempted therefrom in respect of such dealing; and 

(d) no prospectus in respect of the offer has been registered by the Authority or, where a 

prospectus has been registered — (i) the prospectus has expired pursuant to section 250 of 

the SFA; or (ii) the person making the offer has before making the offer — (A) informed the 

Authority by notice in writing of its intent to make the offer in reliance on the exemption under 

section 275(1A) of the SFA; and (B) taken reasonable steps to inform in writing the person to 

whom the offer is made that the offer is made in reliance on the exemption under 

section 275(1A) of the SFA. 



 

    

59 

CONTAINED IN THIS WHITEPAPER WILL NOT CONSTITUTE AN OFFER TO 

SELL OR THE SOLICITATION OF AN OFFER TO BUY ANY LYDIAN TOKENS 

WITHIN THE PRC.  THIS WHITEPAPER AND THE INFORMATION CONTAINED 

IN THIS WHITEPAPER HAVE NOT BEEN AND WILL NOT BE SUBMITTED TO 

OR APPROVED/VERIFIED BY OR REGISTERED WITH ANY RELEVANT 

GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITIES IN THE PRC AND MAY NOT BE SUPPLIED 

TO THE PUBLIC IN THE PRC OR USED IN CONNECTION WITH ANY OFFER 

FOR THE SUBSCRIPTION OR SALE OF THE INTERESTS IN THE PRC.  THE 

LYDIAN TOKENS MAY ONLY BE OFFERED OR SOLD TO PRC PURCHASERS 

THAT ARE AUTHORIZED TO ENGAGE IN THE PURCHASE OF LYDIAN 

TOKENS OF THE TYPE BEING OFFERED OR SOLD.  PRC PURCHASERS ARE 

RESPONSIBLE FOR OBTAINING ALL RELEVANT GOVERNMENT 

REGULATORY APPROVALS/LICENSES, VERIFICATION AND/OR 

REGISTRATION THEMSELVES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY 

WHICH MAY BE REQUIRED FROM THE PEOPLE’S BANK OF CHINA, THE 

STATE ADMINISTRATION OF FOREIGN EXCHANGE, THE CHINA SECURITIES 

REGULATORY COMMISSION, THE CHINA BANKING REGULATORY 

COMMISSION, THE CHINA INSURANCE REGULATORY COMMISSION AND 

OTHER REGULATORY BODIES, AND COMPLYING WITH ALL RELEVANT 

PRC REGULATIONS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY RELEVANT 

FOREIGN EXCHANGE REGULATIONS AND/OR OVERSEAS INVESTMENT 

REGULATIONS.  

Further Disclaimer 

This Whitepaper does not constitute a recommendation by LydianCoin SG or the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family or any other person, or advice to any recipient of this 

Whitepaper, on the merits of Lydian tokens.  This Whitepaper does not necessarily 

identify, or purport to identify, all the risk factors associated with Lydian tokens.  

Prospective participants must make their own independent assessment, after 

making such investigations as they consider necessary, of the merits of 

participating in the proposed sale of Lydian tokens.  Prospective participants should 

consult and rely upon their own investment, accounting, legal and tax 

representatives and advisers as to such matters concerning a purchase of and 



 

    

60 

investment in Lydian tokens and to evaluate independently the financial risks, 

consequences and suitability of an investment in the Lydian tokens, or if in any 

doubt about the contents of this Whitepaper. 

An investment in Lydian tokens carries substantial risk and may involve special 

risks that could lead to a loss of all or a substantial portion of such investment (see 

further under the section headed “Risk Factors”).  Unless prospective participants 

fully understand and accept the nature of Lydian tokens and the potential risks 

inherent in an investment in Lydian tokens they should not invest in Lydian tokens.  

Each prospective participant is wholly responsible for ensuring that all aspects of 

an investment in Lydian tokens are acceptable to them. 

There can be no assurance that a purchaser’s objective in its purchase of Lydian 

tokens will be achieved and prospective purchasers should carefully consider 

whether a purchase of Lydian tokens is suitable for them in light of their 

circumstances and financial resources. 

Prospective participants should inform themselves as to the legal requirements 

within the countries of their nationality, residence, ordinary residence or domicile for 

such acquisition, any foreign exchange restrictions or exchange control 

requirements which they might encounter on acquisition or negotiating of Lydian 

tokens and the income tax and other taxation consequences which might be 

relevant to the acquisition, holding or negotiating of Lydian tokens. 

IF THE PROSPECTIVE PURCHASER IS IN ANY DOUBT ABOUT THE 

CONTENTS OF THIS DOCUMENT THEY SHOULD CONSULT WITH THEIR 

ACCOUNTANTS, LEGAL ADVISORS OR OTHER PROFESSIONAL ADVISORS 

BEFORE INVESTING. 

Anti-Money Laundering 

Measures aimed at the prevention of money laundering may require a participant in 

this proposed sale of Lydian tokens to verify his, her or its identity and/or the source 

of funds to the LydianCoin SG.  By way of example, an individual may be required 

to produce the original passport or identification card or copy duly certified by a 



 

    

61 

public authority such as a notary public, the police or the ambassador in his or her 

country of residence, together with two original documents evidencing his or her 

address such as a utility bill or bank statement or duly certified copies.  In the case 

of corporate (or other entity) applicants this may require production of a certified 

copy of the related organizational documents (and any change of name) or the 

equivalent, and of the names and residential and business addresses of all 

directors, officers and beneficial owners.  The details given above are by way of 

example only and LydianCoin SG will request such information and documentation 

as it considers is necessary to verify the identity or source of funds of a potential 

purchaser at the time of a potential sale. 

Each purchaser acknowledges that LydianCoin SG shall be held harmless by such 

purchaser against any loss arising as a result of a failure to provide such 

information and documentation as has been requested by LydianCoin SG or if such 

purchaser provides any information or documentation to LydianCoin SG that is 

false or misleading in any respect. 

No Representations and Warranties 

LydianCoin SG does not make or purport to make, and hereby disclaims, any 

representation, warranty or undertaking in any form whatsoever to any entity or 

person, including any representation, warranty or undertaking in relation to the 

truth, accuracy and completeness of any of the information set out in this 

Whitepaper. 

Representations and Warranties of Purchasers 

By accessing and/or accepting possession of any information in this Whitepaper or 

any part thereof, or by participating in the proposed sale of Lydian tokens as 

described herein, each purchaser represents and warrants to LydianCoin SG that: 

(a) such purchaser is not a citizen or resident alien of the United 

States, unless such person is an “accredited investor” as defined in 

Regulation D under the Securities Act; 



 

    

62 

(b) such purchaser is not a citizen or resident of a country the laws of 

which prohibit or conflict with this proposed sale of Lydian tokens 

or the purchaser’s participation in such proposed sale; 

(c) the amounts invested by such purchaser were not and are not 

directly or indirectly derived from any activities that contravene the 

laws and regulations of any jurisdiction, including anti-money 

laundering laws and regulations; 

(d) none of:  (1) such purchaser; (2) any person controlling or 

controlled by such purchaser; (3) if such purchaser is a privately-

held entity, any person having a beneficial interest in such 

purchaser; or (4) any person for whom such purchaser acting as 

agent or nominee in connection with this purchase is a country, 

territory, entity or individual named on an OFAC list, or a person or 

entity prohibited under the OFAC Programs; 

(e) none of:  (1) such purchaser; (2) any person controlling or 

controlled by such purchaser; (3) if such purchaser is a privately-

held entity, any person having a beneficial interest in such 

purchaser; or (4) any person for whom such purchaser is acting as 

agent or nominee in connection with this purchase is a senior 

foreign political figure, or any immediate family member or close 

associate of a senior foreign political figure, as such terms are 

defined below; 

A “senior foreign political figure” is defined as a senior official in the 

executive, legislative, administrative, military or judicial branch of a 

government (whether elected or not), a senior official of a major 

political party, or a senior executive of a foreign government-owned 

corporation.  In addition, a “senior foreign political figure” includes 

any corporation, business or other entity that has been formed by, 

or for the benefit of, a senior foreign political figure.  “Immediate 

family” of a senior foreign political figure typically includes such 

figure’s parents, siblings, spouse, children and in-laws.  A “close 



 

    

63 

associate” of a senior foreign political figure is a person who is 

widely and publicly known to maintain an unusually close 

relationship with such senior foreign political figure, and includes a 

person who is in a position to conduct substantial domestic and 

international financial transactions on behalf of such senior foreign 

political figure. 

(f) if such purchaser is affiliated with a non-U.S. banking institution (a 

“Foreign Bank”), or if you receive deposits from, make payments 

on behalf of, or handle other financial transactions related to a 

Foreign Bank, you represent and warrant to the LydianCoin SG 

that:  (1) the Foreign Bank has a fixed address, and not solely an 

electronic address, in a country in which the Foreign Bank is 

authorized to conduct banking activities; (2) the Foreign Bank 

maintains operating records related to its banking activities; (3) the 

Foreign Bank is subject to inspection by the banking authority that 

licensed the Foreign Bank to conduct its banking activities; and 

(4) the Foreign Bank does not provide banking services to any 

other Foreign Bank that does not have a physical presence in any 

country and that is not a regulated affiliate; 

(g) such purchaser has a substantial understanding of the 

functionality, usage, storage, transmission mechanisms and 

intricacies associated with cryptographic tokens or coins, and 

blockchain-based software ledger systems; 

(h) such purchaser is legally permitted to participate in this proposal 

sale of Lydian tokens and all actions contemplated or associated 

with such proposal sale, including the holding and use of such 

tokens; 

(i) if the purchaser is a natural person, such purchaser is of a 

sufficient age and capacity under the applicable laws of the 

jurisdiction in which such purchaser resides and the jurisdiction of 



 

    

64 

which such purchaser is a citizen to participate in this proposed 

sale of tokens; 

(j) such purchaser is not obtaining or using Lydian tokens for any 

illegal purposes; 

(k) such purchaser waives the right to participate in a class action 

lawsuit or a class wide arbitration against LydianCoin SG, any 

member of the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family or any entity or 

individual involved with the creation and proposed sale of Lydian 

tokens; 

(l) such purchaser understands the participation in the proposed sale 

of Lydian tokens does not involve the purchase of securities in any 

jurisdiction; 

(m) such purchaser understands that the participation in the proposal 

sale of Lydian tokens and purchase and use of Lydian tokens may 

carry significant financial, regulatory and reputational risks; 

(n) such purchaser understands and expressly accepts that there is no 

warranty whatsoever on Lydian tokens, expressed or implied, to 

the extent permitted by law; 

(o) such purchaser understands that the value of Lydian tokens (if 

any) over time may experience extreme volatility or depreciate in 

full; 

(p) such purchaser understands that such purchaser bears the sole 

responsibility to determine what tax implications a purchase in the 

Lydian tokens may have for such purchaser and agrees not to hold 

LydianCoin SG or any other person involved in the proposed sale 

of the Lydian tokens liable for any tax liability associated with or 

arising therefrom. 



 

    

65 

(q) you agree and acknowledge that this Whitepaper does not 

constitute a prospectus or offer document of any sort and is not 

intended to constitute an offer of securities of any form, units in a 

business trust, units in a collective investment scheme or any other 

form of investment in any jurisdiction, or a solicitation for any form 

of investment, and you are not bound to enter into any contract or 

binding legal commitment and no cryptocurrency or other form of 

payment is to be accepted on the basis of this Whitepaper; 

(r) no regulatory authority has examined or approved of the 

information set out in this Whitepaper, no action has been or will be 

taken under the laws, regulatory requirements or rules of any 

jurisdiction and the publication, distribution or dissemination of this 

Whitepaper to you does not imply that the applicable laws, 

regulatory requirements or rules have been complied with; 

(s) you agree and acknowledge that this Whitepaper, the undertaking 

and/or the completion of the Lydian token sale, or future trading of 

Lydian tokens on any cryptocurrency exchange, shall not be 

construed, interpreted or deemed by you as an indication of the 

merits of LydianCoin SG or the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family, 

Lydian tokens and/or the Lydian token sale; 

(t) the distribution or dissemination of this Whitepaper, any part 

thereof or any copy thereof, or acceptance of the same by you, is 

not prohibited or restricted by the applicable laws, regulations or 

rules in your jurisdiction, and where any restrictions in relation to 

possession are applicable, you have observed and complied with 

all such restrictions at your own expense and without liability to 

LydianCoin SG or the DaVinci 11 Corporate Family; 

(u) you agree and acknowledge that in the case where you wish to 

purchase any Lydian tokens the Lydian tokens are not to be 

construed, interpreted, classified or treated as: 



 

    

66 

(i) any kind of currency; 

(ii) debentures, stocks or shares issued by any person or 

entity; 

(iii) rights, options or derivatives in respect of such debentures, 

stocks or shares; 

(iv) rights under a contract for differences or under any other 

contract the purpose or pretended purpose of which is to 

secure a profit or avoid a loss; 

(v) units in a collective investment scheme; 

(vi) units in a business trust; 

(vii) derivatives of units in a business trust; or 

(viii) any other security, class of securities or form of 

investment; 

(v) you have a basic degree of understanding of the operation, 

functionality, usage, storage, transmission mechanisms and other 

material characteristics of cryptocurrencies, blockchain-based 

software systems, cryptocurrency wallets or other related token 

storage mechanisms, blockchain technology and smart contract 

technology; 

(w) you agree and acknowledge that none of LydianCoin SG or the 

DaVinci 11 Corporate Family is liable for any indirect, special, 

incidental, consequential or other losses of any kind, in tort, 

contract or otherwise (including but not limited to loss of revenue, 

income or profits, and loss of use or data), arising out of or in 

connection with any acceptance of or reliance on this Whitepaper 

or any part thereof by you; and 



 

    

67 

(x) all of the above representations and warranties are true, complete, 

accurate and non-misleading from the time of your access to 

and/or acceptance of possession this Whitepaper or such part 

thereof (as the case may be). 

Further Representations and Warranties of Purchasers that are United States 

Citizens 

Although LydianCoin SG does not consider the Lydian tokens to be “securities” 

under the Securities Act, nonetheless as a matter of best practice, LydianCoin SG 

will require that, each initial purchaser of Lydian tokens that is a United States 

citizen represent and warrant to LydianCoin SG that it would qualify as an 

accredited investor as defined in Regulation D under the Securities Act if it were 

investing in securities offering, meaning a person or entity that falls within any one 

or more of the following categories: 

(i) Any bank, as defined in Section 3(a)(2) of the Securities Act, or 

any savings and loan association or other institution defined in 

Section 3(a)(5)(A) of the Securities Act, whether acting in its 

individual or fiduciary capacity; any broker-dealer registered 

pursuant to Section 15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as 

amended; any insurance company, as defined in Section 2(13) of 

the Securities Act; any investment company registered under the 

Investment Company Act or a business development company, as 

defined in Section 2(a)(48) of the Investment Company Act; any 

Small Business Investment Company licensed by the United 

States Small Business Administration under Section 301(c) or (d) 

of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958; any plan 

established and maintained by a state, its political subdivisions or 

any agency or instrumentality of a state or its political subdivisions 

for the benefit of its employees, if such plan has total assets in 

excess of $5,000,000; and any employee benefit plan within the 

meaning of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 

as amended, if the investment decision is made by a plan fiduciary, 



 

    

68 

as defined in Section 3(21) of the Employee Retirement Income 

Security Act, that is either a bank, savings and loan association, 

insurance company or registered investment advisor, if the 

employee benefit plan has total assets in excess of $5,000,000 or, 

if a self-directed plan, with investment decisions made solely by 

person(s) that are accredited investor(s); 

(ii) Any private business development company as defined in 

Section 202(a)(22) of the Investment Advisors Act of 1940, as 

amended; 

(iii) Any organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal 

Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, any corporation, 

Massachusetts or similar business trust, or company, not formed 

for the specific purpose of acquiring the Lydian tokens, with total 

assets in excess of $5,000,000; 

(iv) Any director or executive officer of LydianCoin SG; 

(v) Any natural person whose individual net worth, or joint net worth 

with that person’s spouse, exclusive of the value of the person’s 

primary residence net of any mortgage debt and other liens, at the 

time of his or her purchase exceeds $1,000,000; 

(vi) Any natural person who had an individual income in excess of 

$200,000, or joint income with that person’s spouse in excess of 

$300,000, in each of the two most recent years and who 

reasonably expects to reach the same income level in the current 

year; 

(vii) Any trust with total assets in excess of $5,000,000, not formed for 

the specific purpose of acquiring the Lydian tokens, whose 

purchase is directed by a sophisticated person as described in 

Rule 506(b)(2)(ii) of Regulation D; or 

(viii) Any entity all of whose equity owners are accredited investors. 



 

    

69 

The term “net worth” means the excess of total assets over total liabilities, exclusive 

of the value of your primary residence net of any mortgage debt and other liens.  In 

determining income, you should add to your adjusted gross income any amounts 

attributable to tax-exempt income received, losses claimed as a limited partner in 

any limited partnership, deductions claimed for depreciation, contributions to an 

IRA or Keogh retirement plan, alimony payments and any amount by which income 

from long-term capital gains had been reduced in arriving at adjusted gross income. 

Each such initial purchaser may also be required to provide certain documentation 

in support of such representation.  In addition to the foregoing requirement, each 

such initial purchaser must also represent in writing that it is acquiring the Lydian 

tokens for its own account and not for the account of others and not with a view to 

resell or distribute such tokens. 

 


